THE
YOUNG ARTIST
CHAPTER I.
There be stories tolden in pictures as well as in bokes and a cunning
paynter doth discourse with his pencil even as a ready wryter doth with
his pen; and some do think he hath the greater honor and the dignity;
inasmuch
as genius is more excelling in artes than in lettres.
The old stage road from Philadelphia to Lancaster, within a league
or more of the latter place, descends abruptly into a narrow glen,
through which, over a rocky bed, tumbles a wild and noisy brook.
Gigantic trees line its rugged banks, and form above a leafy canopy,
through which the noon-day sun scarce penetrates, flecking the dark
sward beneath with splashes of golden light, and gilding here and
there a sparkling wave as it leaps upward in its gambols. Across the
stream is thrown a rustic bridge, so old that from the huge gaps in
in its crazy joints, there grow, nourished by the dark, rich loam, with
which time has filled them, long waving grass, shrubs, and even
flourishing
young trees; so that the passing traveller is scarcely less
over-shadowed
in crossing the bridge than in the forests through which
the road has hitherto wound. One of the rude beams of the structure,
with an eye both to economy and strength, characteristic of those
days when it was built, is morticed in the trunk of an aged sycamore,
which flings broadly above it, its long, white spectral arms, as if its
protecting genii. At the foot of the tree, a narrow, rustic wheel-road
turns off to the right, and following the bank disappears in the
intricacies
of the overhanging trees. Upon the bark of the sycamore,
but so near the ground that a horseman would have to lean from his
saddle to read it, is nailed a guide-board, fashioned like a man's hand,
with the fore finger extended. From its worm-eaten corners, its
weather-beaten face, and faintly visible characters, it doubtless was
placed there by the founders of the bridge itself. With some
difficulty
,
the words,
To Eden
can be made out by the curious
traveller
who may chance in a summer's day to stop and refresh his horse
and himself in the cool glade, ere he attempts the perilous passage of
the little bridge before him.
`
To Eden
.
This is all the passing traveller knows. Not a figure to mark the
distance, nor the least trace of there ever having been any placed
there, is visible to the nicest eye. To Eden! reads the stranger.
and passes on his way; and the little finger-board which for a
moment
drew his attention and awakened a temporary curiosity is soon
forgotten! But it shall not be so with ourselves, dear reader! We
are a traveller, not of the highways but of the byways; the seeker
out of snug rural nooks; a lover of shade rather than of sunshine;
delighting more in the fragrance of flowers, and the green sward
that clothes the hills and all the vallies round, than in the rocky
turnpike
and dusty thoroughfares; beholding more beauty in a majestic
tree than in a stately tower; more harmony in the hum of a bee than
in the buzz of the crowd; more beauty in a running rivulet than in
the finest
jet d'eau;
more enjoyment in a ramble through a woodland
path than a dashing drive through Chestnut street; and, altogether
believing that true happiness is to be sought rather in the quiet
corners
of the world than amid the splendid pageantries of life, invested
as they may be with all the blandishments of art. We will not now,
therefore, cross the old bridge and travel along the turnpike; but
leaving the highway, turn short into the path at the foot of the tree,
and follow its windings beside the brook, which, after twice leaping
into a cascade of tumbling snow, and thrice spreading out into a
miniature mere, without a ripple upon the mirror like surface of its
breast, dashes riotously through a narrow channel, and is lost amid
the gloom of the deep set forests. But after a brief absence, if we
continue our way, we shall see it issuing in a vale and expanding into
a little lake of the most picturesque character, with a quiet hamlet of
a few white cottages, clustered about a snowy spire, on one side, and
a gentle slope of pasture land, sprinkled with herds on the other;
while around rise hills with green luxuriant swells, either crested with
noble forests, or sweeping down to the shore, in lawns of the
brightest
verdure. This hamlet is
Eden!
the valley, which you perceive
is not a mile in length, and in width scarce half as much, is called
Eden Valley; and the lake, lively with ducks and geese, and
children's
adventurous barks, sent off with many a shout, from the
village
shore, is called Eden Mere. Is it not all beautiful! so still,
so quiet, so rural, so shut out from the world around it! How much
we should have lost, had we crossed the old bridge and rode on to
Lancaster, and yet have wandered only a mile and a half from the
high road; for, the venerable guide-board is silent, this only is the
distance of the lowly hamlet from the old sycamore. Indeed it is so
near that the village children used always of a Saturday afternoon to
follow the stream up to the bridge to fish; for there is beneath it, nigh
one corner, a fine deep trout-hole, in which their dirty naked feet,
hanging over the timber ends, the holiday rogues would ply their
hooks till they could no longer see their shadows in the black waters
below them; then with their loaded baskets, they would-start on a
nimble race homeward, and as twillight gathered the faster they ran;
for there were familiar tales of woodland goblins, remembered then,
that quickened their pace, lest night should overtake them ere they
reached the school house; which being the first building on the
village
skirts, in the direction of the bridge, was to them, safe ground.
This school-house was an ancient scructure, having existed through
three generations of village urchins, the grand child sitting at the
same hacked and inky bench where his grandfather had been first
inducted
into the mysteries of Dilworth.
It stood at the extremity of the village street, on an open green
space, where several forest oaks, suffered to remain, cast a shade upon
its roof and the surrounding lawn, which, in summer, was their play
ground; the Mere, which was a stone's throw in front, being in
winter
,
with its glassy bosom inviting the skater to his favorite pastime,
substituted for it. The school house was a square wooden building,
with a high Dutch roof, its low eaves stretching on every side, far
beyond the outer walls. It had four windows placed very high from
the ground, one on each side of the house; and a single door facing
the water. An irregular flat stone, well worn by little feet, was laid
before it, and the grass, for many yards around it, was trodden by the
feet of three generations of urchins, till it had become nearly as hard
and smooth as the door stone itself. Every thing about the
school-house
was characteristic. The narrow clapboards were covered with
initials; and names only traditionally known in the village, were cnt
deep into the wood, with jack knives, some bearing date as far
back as 1753; while here and there were curious hieroglyphics, that
no man might tell the meaning of, but doubtless meant for good
honest
words and letters: there were to be seen, also, profiles of more
or less merit; men, all legs and head; scrawls with lead pencils or
red chalk on the smoother and whiter surfaces; names of favorite
school girls, now grandmothers; caricatures of the several masters,
and the usual display of obscene words, that show the corrupt state
of the human heart even in its earliest existenceone and all
charcteristics
of a village school house.
Dominie Spankie, at the period of our stay, presided over the
destinies
of the three-score-and-ten urchins that constituted the juvenile
population of the village of Eden; and this school house was the
realm in which he had reigned for forty years; and scarce was there
to be found a male inhabitant, under fifty years of age in the village,
whom, in his time, the Dominie had not had between his knees,
inflicting
upon him the healthful dicipline of castigation. The
Dominie
had once been a soldier in the wars, having followed Braddock
into the wilderness, and got much damage, as he asseverated, by the
dread onslaught of the wild savages, losing two fingers on his right
hand by the blow of a tomahawk, and one of his eyes by an arrow:
and it was pleasant of a Saturday evening to him, on the stoop of the
quiet inn of Eden, to relate his warlike exploits, using his ferule, which
he never let out of his hand, save when sleeping, now as a musket, now
as a broadsword, to aid in illustrating to his wondering listeners, the
deeds he had seen and of which he had been a part. The Dominie
was tall of stature, erect and military in his port; with a long and
sinewy frame, marvellously spare of flesh. His hair was thick and
and grey, for he was waxing towards his sixtieth year, and being
brushed
desperately back from his forehead, bristled over his head after a
exceedingly terrific manner. His long habit of command over a
regiment
of unruly breechlings, had settled a frown upon his shaggy
brows; and, as nature had given him a sort of under-eye-brow, his
aspect, combined with his sightless orb, when the other was turned
upon an offender, was awful to behold. The Dominie, indeed
governed
by his eye alone; a look being found sufficient to paralyze the
stoutest
urchin that had the misfortune to incur his wrath. His long
service
as master, and elevatud him in some sense, to the dignity of
pater familias
to the whole village; all the souls in which had been
in their youth, under his especial eye; and from long habit he still
felt disposed to look after the manners and affairs of his quondam
pupils
,
and they themselves, from the same force of habit, to yield him
reverence and obedience. So, what with the boys at school, and their
fathers at home, the Dominie got to be, save the minister, the most
important personage in Eden. By the good wives he was looked
upon
with a respect amounting to awe; and as he would frown upon
them as well as upon their lords and their lords pledges, when things
went not to his liking, his looks made such an impression upon many
of the more nervous portion of the woman kind, that, (being a
bachelor
,
the Dominie did little consider the times and seasons for
administering
refroof,) nearly every other male child, to the wonder and
astonishment
of the whole hamlet, came into the world marked with
one eye, and a double pair of eye-brows, looking for all the world
as like the Dominie's as one pea looks like another. But this belongs
rather to the Chronicles of the Hamlet of Eden, and to the Life
and Acts of Dominie Spankie, (which have carefully been written
and peradventure, one day will see the light,) than to our story, to
which what has yet been said is only prefatory.
CHAPTER II.
One sultry Saturday forenoon, in August, about half an hour before
closing the school, Dominie Spankie sat upon his throne which was
an arm chair placed upon a platform, raised two steps above the floor.
Before him, rising one behind the other, were the ranges of benches
filled with the boys, the biggest in the back seats, and the littlest,
down to three years old and under, on the front forms, immediately
beneath his terrible eye, and only seaprated from him by the area
between
his desk and their seats. The huge fireplace upon the right
of his throne, was garnished with a young pine tree and other
ever-greens
,
and on the broken hearth before it, as the coolest spot was
placed a stone pitcher of water, with a tin cup floating upon its surface.
It was a very warm day; and scarcely did the light air that came in
at the windows lift the leaves of the numerous open books, for every
book was laid open before its owner, and the whole school, under the
viligant observance of the Dominie, appeared to be studious. Many
of the younger boys, in truth, were hard at work, from fear of the
birch, which was laid upon the desk before their eyes,
in terrorem;
and
buzz, buzz, buzz
went their little lips for very life. Others held
their books perpendicularly before their faces, and with one eye fixed
desperately upon the page, kept the other askance upon the master,
for the Dominie had a way doubtless learned in his wars against the
savages, of flinging his oaken ferule through the air, like a tomahawk,
so that would unerringly light, (so true was his arm from long
practice
,)
on the desk in front of any idler, without exactly hitting him
on the head, but giving him a good start at the time, with a sure
promise of flagellation: for the flight of the ruler was sure to be
followed
in a voice stern, and loud, by
`Bring me that ferule, young master!' when the instrument was
duly put to its more legitimate use.
The boys had just come in from recess, when the Dominie cast his
eye sternly over the schoolroom, to see if he could single out any
unlucky
juvenile inattentive to his task, his ferule balanced across the
palm of his left hand, with the two fingers and thumb of the right,
gently dallying with its extremity. Instantly every soul went to work,
and lips moved mechanically in the sound of study, though, so far as
what was repeated from the page before most of them, was
underderstood
,
they might have been reading Chinese as well as the king's
English. The Dominie wore spectacles, (a pair of massive iron ones,)
that oddly reminded you of the crusading knights, or Don Quixote
in armour, which combined with the obliquity of his vision, put the
shrewdest boy at fault in guessing, when he happened to lift his face
from the desk and look over the school, on which point exactly his
gaze rested; each one, therefore, supposed himself as likely to be the
victim as any of his fellows. So when the Dominie, from time to
time, looked up, and gravely surveyed the array of boys, he always
gazed upon a praiseworthy scene; when apparently satisfied at the
diligent aspect of his schoolroom, he would ejaculate a gratified
hem
,
and turn again to his task of ruling copy-books, or setting copies for
the ensuing week. Although so strict a disciplinarian, the Dominie,
like most men, especially schoolmasters, had fallen into certain habits
and methods, all of which were well understood by his more
saga-cious
pupils, who governed themselves accordingly. One of these
habits was, while ruling copy-books, always to lift his eye when he
got the end of the page, and in setting a copy, when he had given
the finishing hair stroke to the line. So, calculating on these
periodical
inspections of the school-room, the elder and more observing
boys, would cleverly manage to time their idle moments to tally with
his busy ones: and by this politic arrangement much room was given
for play and mischief making. The Dominie wrote very slowly, and
with great method; for he prided himself greatly on the beauty of his
penmanship, deeming the art of calligraphy as important to the
schoolmaster as the knowledge of figures and other mysteries,
invented
to puzzle boy's brains.
On the afternoon in question, after having ruled a page for `fine
hand,' he looked up, as was his custom, and chanced to decry an
abortive
attempt to suppress a laugh, on the faces of all the boys in the
back forms, and the best part of those on the second row of desks.
He paused, and his brow darkened; but wilily pretending not to
observe
this unseemingly merriment, well assured that the cause would
soon show itself, he husbanded his wrath, and resolved patiently to wait
until the treason was ripe. Therefore, he turned himself once more
to his copy; and as in the alphabetical arrangement it should begin
with D, he commenced penning his own euphonious name and
designation
,
and both having great favor in his eye, he speedily lost the
sense of the outrage that had been offered to his authority and
magisterial
presence, in the pride of exercising his penmanship on
the flowing letters that compose Dominie Spankie, A. M.
Scarcely
had he termined the serpentine flourish that indicated the initial of
`
Spankie
,' than a stifled burst of choking laughter, from some
unlucky
urchin, caused him to erect his ears and bend his brows;
nevertheless
he continued to write on; but scarce had he finished the
final
e
, turning the tail therefore gracefully back, over the
k
, like a
canopy, than a suppressed titter from the a, b, c bench at his feet,
caused him to start up, with a growl of astonishment and wrathful
indignation
.
He glared about the schoolroom and beheld one
universal
grin on every visage, while the little tremblers at his feet kept up
a tittering and giggling they in vain tried to suppress by stuffing their
sponges and handkerchiefs into their mouths, two or three in the
attempt
,
even forcing tears from their eyes; while fear of the Dominie's
wrath, mingling with the cause of their mirth, caused other little
wretches both to laugh and to cry at one and the same moment.
Sounds so strange as laughter in the school-room, a place where a
smiling, happy, and cheerful face, seems to be regarded by most `
masters'
as treasonable to their tyrannical rule, had never been heard
before
within those old walls. The Dominie was thunderstruck. He
could scarcely believe that he heard what he did hear, saw what he
did see! Boys daring to langh in his presence! Grinning visages
surrounded him on all sides! He shoved back his spectacles from
his forehead, as was his wont at such times; lowered his
thunder-cloud
looking brows; balanced his ferule, preparatory to a cast, and
began to squint horribly around in search of the ringleader. At this
movement and disposition of his person, there bust one universal
uncontrollable shout of laughter, from every juvenile throat, so
long and so loud was it, that it was heard even in the midst of the
village, to the infinite wonder and alarm of the adult pupils of
Dominie
Spankie, who could not divine the meaning of so strange a
sound coming from such a source.
`It's te boys let out o' school,' says one of a group of villagers
gathered about the inn.
`Nay,' said another, shaking his head, `'tis na twal o' the clock,
an' the Doominie e'er stickes to the minnit o't. The lads be unco
fay.'
`Mercy me! what has come up o'er at the school house, ayond?
D' ye not hear the childer, Maggy?' asked one gossip, seated
knitting
in the door of her neighbor across the way.
`Gracious, and 'deed do I! and it's a merry laugh the dears give.
Where can the Dominie be away, and it's not noon,' answered the
other, giving a knowing look at the sun as she ended.
`Mony's the dee I've heard the skreel when the brecken were doon
from that awa, but it's the first time I heard laughter,' said an old
Scotch woman, stopping her wheel, and taking a pinch of snuff;
`Fech! there's somethin' in it a' ye may depend! cummers!'
Suddenly Dominie Spankie recovered his voice and his presence of
mind. `Silence!' he shouted, in a voice of thunder, bringing
his ferule down on his desk and his foot on the floor, at the same time
with terrible emphasis. Instantly the merriment, save one or two
faint note from the smaller boys, ceased, and a portentous silence
followed
.
`What means this outrage upon my authority?'who caused this
laughter?' be demanded, in a voice that made the little boys shake
in their trowsers, and the larger ones look sufficiently sober. The
only reply was a general direction of eyes towards the red brick
chimney
,
which protruded into the room, followed instantly by a
suppressed
titter from many of the boys, and a loud guffaw, in the back
form, from a thick set, clownish, lad, about sixteen years old, who
almost
suffocated himself with his fist to keep from giving vent to his
cachinations. But they were suddenly checked by the `ruler,' which
whizzed through the air, glanced by his ear, and buried itself half an
inch in the plastering of the wall behind him. The Dominie was
foaming with rage and could not even articulate the words
commanding
him to bring the ruler. The lad, however, from habit, took the
instrument in his hand, and leaving his form descended the steep
alley
between the seats and the desk, and held it forth. For a few
seconds the Dominie paced the floor, without taking it or noticing
him; at length, having in some degree conquered his surprise at the
events he had witnessed, he laid his hand on the boy's shoulder, with
a gripe that caused him to roar with pain.
`Tell me, Davy Dow,' he cried, in a voice that made the stoutest
boy's heart quake, `who and what is the cause of this uproar? Tell
me truly, or I will not leave a bone whole in your body!' and he shook
him as if he would even then fulfil his threat.
`I didn't do it, master,' said the boy as well as he could speak.
`Whatdo what? you scape gallows! do what? you wretched
little villain!' shouted the Dominie, lifting him from his feet, and
shaking him at arm's length.
`Make um laugh, sir. Haw, haw, haw!'
`He, he, he!' tittered the school.
`What! do I hear laughing again?' almost yelled the Dominie,
and his eye followed that of the culprit, in the direction of the
chimney
.
Instantly a change came over his spirit. He beheld, affixed to the
chimney, facing him and the whole school, what no man could
mistake
an
admirable, half-length likeness of himself, caricatured with
surpassing skill. His spectacles were pictured, thrown up to the top
of his forehead; his ruler was in his hand, as if in the act of being
cast at some unruly boy, and he was represented in the act of
frowning
most terribly. It was the exact image of Dominie Spankie. The
likeness ludricrously correct, and he himself, even if he had never
looked into a mirror, could not but have recognized it. He
did
recognize
it, and saw at once what had excited the risible muscles of
his slaves, (for what were pupils twenty years ago, but slaves, for six
hours in a day!) and he trembled with passion. He turned slowly
round, and as he did so, the titter, which, as he detected the
caricature
,
had begun to revive, was suddenly suppressed. Every face
encountered
his dark looks, and a portentous silence filled the room.
Each eye was fixed on his, and histo all appearance, was fixed on those
of each one. There was a long and portentous silence. At length
he spoke.
`Davy Dow, you may return to your seat. Henry Irvine, come
here!' The permission and command were both given in the calm
tones of settled and resolute revenge.
The clown obeyed with alacrity; but as he passed the other on his
way towards the desk, he whispered to him, `I'll be dom'd if he shall
strike you, Henry.' The boy gave him a reproving yet grateful
glance, and said, `hush, good Davy, I deserve it now.'
The youth who was called, had left his seat with a fearless smile.
With a firm, light tread, he descended the alley and stood before the
Dominie. He was about sixteen years of age, with a high, white
forehead, about which brown hair clustered in the utmost profusion;
his eyes were large, black, and sparkling with genius. His face was
strikingly handsome, his figure elegant, and his manners graceful. He
was evidently far superior to his fellows in birth and mental culture,
as well as in person.
Henry Irvine was, in the beautiful language of Scripture, `the only
son of his mother, and she was a widow.' His father had been the
village pastor, until his death, a few years before and his successor
taking the parsonage, the widow, with scarce a pittance, (for country
clergymen can seldom do more than make both ends meet,) retired to
a lowly dwelling, the residence of a widow in humble life, but better
circumstances, than herself, who, for a trifling sum, rented her and
her son, part of her tenement. But Henry soon lost his remaining
parent
,
and to the widow Dow he looked up as to a second mother, and
between himself and her son, though nature had given them
minds of a different order there existed the ardent love of twin
brothers
.
Davy was rough in person, and blunt in manners, but he
possessed
a kind heart, and was capable of strong attachments; and,
though a clown, had a breast full of generous feelings to
counterbalance
his want of refinement. The more cultivated and intellectual
Henry, appreciated his warm attachment, though Davy's was an
affection
more like the shaggy Newfoundland entertains towards a beloved
master, than that between two beings whom fortune, not nature, had
placed on the same social level.
`Thee sha'n't be struck, Henry I'll be dom'd if thee shall,' were
words that forcibly illustrated the nature and the strength of the
attachment
of the faithful peasant. Dominie Spankie drew up his lengthy
figure to its full longitude, and bent a withering look upon Henry,
who met it with a steady and fearless bearing. There was a dead,
expecting silence throughout the room. The humming of fleas that
circled above the Dominie's head, was the only thing to be heard. At
length he moved to his throne and seat ed himself with direful
solemnity
.
`Henry Irvine stand before me!'
He silently obeyed. `I need not ask,' continued he, pointing to
the caricature, `if that be thy handy work, for none else in this school
hath that gift of the devil's art, save thyself. Confess and deny it not,
stripling, that it was thyself who hast vilified thy preceptor: thy
pater
of learning and letters; the teacher of the humanities to a horde of
gracelings like thyself; who hath inducted thee into Zenophon,
taught thee the beauties of Cicero, and led thee not a little way into
the Hebrew tongue. Say, is it not thou, ungrateful lad, that hast
done this thing?' Here the indignant Dominie pointed with his ferule
towards the painting, which looked so very like himself in his proper
person, that he started at the wonderful likeness, and with his bony
hands, stroked his long visage to ascertain, if indeed it was present
with him and not in the chimney.
`I disdain a falsehood, sir,' replied the boy; `I did do it.'
`Ha! you confess, graceless,' he cried, clutching his ferule tightly.
`So, now will I make an ensample of thee to the whole school. Hold
out your right hand.'
The boy, for a moment, held his breath, and compressed his lips
as if collecting firmness to undergo the torture, and coolly extended
his hand with the open palm upward. It was a soft, elegantly shaped
member, and seemed to quiver instinctively at the pain it was about to
endure. The ferule of Dominie Spankie was an oaken slab, two feet
in length, three inches wide, the thickness of a man's finger and full
three pounds in weight. At one extremity it was made concave, like
a spoon, for the purpose of raising blisters on the part it came in
contact
with. By long handling, this instrument of torture, (which is
still in vogue in most American country schools,) was highly polished
and had become as hard and nearly as dark as ebony. When the
offence
was not of the first order, or the offender was young, the smooth
end of the ferule was graciously used upon his palm; but when the
punishment was to be great, the Dominie was seen to turn the ferule
end for end, and balance it in his fingers with a gratified look, and
more than usual dexterity. There was a vein of cruelty, whether
natural
,
or acquired by a long reign of tyranny, is uncertain, running
through the Dominie's composition, and there is no doubt that he
delighted
in the shrieks of the little victims, and in the blisters and blood
that followed his blows as truly as ever did a Spanish Inquisitor, in
the sufferings of those that had fallen into his merciless grasp
Dominie
Spankie screwed up his visage into a devilish expression of
malignant
triumph as he passed his fingers gently along the ferule, like
an executioner feeling his whip, before inflicting the lash, then
suddenly
up went the heavy weapon, and the next instant it descended
upon the hand, with that sharp, peculiar ringing rap, which all my
male readers will remember, some, I doubt not, feelingly, while
others
will not only recognise the ruler in question, but also Dominie
Spankie himself, or I have painted his portrait far less skilfully with
my pen than the luckless Henry did with the pencil.
A second blow, after an interval long enough for the victim to feel
the full smart of the pain of the first, fell upon the outstretched palm,
now no longer white and soft, but glowing with inflammation. A
third, a fourth, and fifth followed, till twelve most cruel and inhuman
strokes had lacerated the hand, till both blood and water broke from
it, and trickled through its fingers to the ground. The brave boy
bore it like a martyra martyr he sure was to a system of education
disgraceful even to a pagan people, and endurable only in a nation of
serfsyet a system upheld in a Christian land, by ignorant
pedagogues
and sustained and strengthened by the indifference and fears
of parents. What right, moral, social, legalyea, what right so ever
had this man to punish and lacerate this boy? Interrogation crowds
upon interrogation, all alike unanswerable. But this is no place to
discuss the question, though a volume that would come home to the
hearts and feelings of every parent might be written on the subject.
`Now the other hand!' said the implacable Dominie, after
refreshing
himself by drinking the dipper full of water, handed to him by
one of the little boys. Not a groan had yet escaped the manly
sufferer
.
He bore this species of bastinado with a fortitude that should
have put to blush the savage cruelty that inflicted it. He held forth
his left hand and it was in like manner blistered.
`Nay, I have not done with you yet, sir,' said the monster, taking
a bunch of willow-rods down as the youth turned to go to his seat
after
the infliction of the last blow. `Take off your jacket.'
Hitherto the whole school had looked on with trembling sympathy;
one alone, Davy Dow, betraying by his clenched fist, set teeth, and
flushed face, his resentment at the cruelty inflicted upon his friend,
for whom, had he not been forbidden by him, he would have done
battle
even with the Dominie: he now impulsively started to his feet,
leaned forward over the desk, and shook his fists at him, shouting,
`Dom thee, if thou touch 'um again, I'll knock the doon, and be
doom'd to thee, if thee 'rt the Dominie!'
Without speaking, Dominie Spankie advanced in three strides to
the seat of this rebel, seized him by the collar with irresistible force,
dragged him across the benches to his desk, and flung him upon the
floor with such violence, that for a moment he lay there stunned; then
casting a glance of mingled threat and definance over the school, he
turned towards Henry Irvine, and repeated his command to take off
his coat.
`Never, tyrant!' cried Henry, roused rather at his friend's
treatment
,
than on account of his own injuries; `I have borne shame
enough. My punishment has already exceeded my offence. I have
submitted thus far to corporal chastisement, because it is in
conformity
to the vile discipline of schools, but I will bear no more, not even
on my hand. My back, sir, shall never be bared to the cat! I am
no slave, to be whipped with stripes. Custom has made a distinction
between blows on the hand and those on the body, and I have
hitherto
submitted to the least degrading. But I shall do so no longer.'
He stepped back as he spoke, and proudly folded his arms.
`Strip, sir!' thundered the infuriated Dominie.
`Never!' was the quiet and firm reply.
`Then I will tear thy garments from thy shoulders, strip thee to the
skin, and give thee a castigation that thy upstart pride will not
stomach
.'
`Touch me at your peril,' said the boy, in a determined tone, as
the Dominie advanced to seize him.
Heedless of the warning and never dreaming of the resistance from
a pupil, the furious pedagogue placed his hand upon the shoulder of
the spirited lad, and instantly received a blow in the breast that
between
surprise and pain, caused him to start back. But, recovering
himself, he made a second and more furious attempt to seize upon
him, when a heavier and well directed blow on the side of the head,
from Davy Dow, who had got to his feet, knocked him heavily against
the chimney. Before he could recover himself the gallant fellows
followed up their success and inflicted upon his sacred person the
soundest pummelling ever a magister of a village school received, and
one certainly that was most richly deserved. The uproarious shouts
of the tiny boys when they saw their master
hors du combat;
the cries
of the terrified little ones; the mingled shouts and hurrahs, who can
describe? The terrible ferule was broken in two; the bunch of rods
scattered to the winds, by willing hands; and the school-room, save
by a few chicken hearted urchins, who, by remaining, hoped to avert
the Dominie's wrath when he should recover, was instantly deserted,
and the disfranchised boys, half frantic with tremulous joy, were seen
flying and shouting in every direction over the green.
2
CHAPTER III.
On the opposite side of the mere of Eden, half a mile from the
village
,
was situated a gentleman's seat, with its lawns and gardens
extending
quite to the water. It was called `Rosemont,' and was the
residence of Colonel Odlin, who had distinguished himself in the then
recent war of the revolution, and now with fresh military honors, an
ample fortune, and an only daughter, had retired to this lovely spot.
He was proud and haughty, and educated his daughter in aristocratic
seclusion; but nevertheless occasionally permitted her to visit Eden,
and once a month attend the village church. Mary Elizabeth Odlin
was a sweet, delicate girl, with soft black eyes of the identical rich
color of her auburn hair, which at every motion of her head,
reflected
a sunny hue of gold: her complexion was unsulied as snow, and
so transparent was the skin of her hands, temples, and round white
neck, that the veins could be followed by the blue tints underneath.
She was scarcely sixteen, a little below the middle height, with a round
full figure, light and agile in its motion as the pet fawn that
accompanied
her in all her walks. She had a lively spirit, a gentle temper,
a musical laugh, and a smile so sweet and expressive of her
happy-heartedness
,
that one could not look upon, without feeling an interest
in her; few saw without loving her. I forgot to say, too, that she
sang with great simplicity and taste, several gentle songs; had an
exquisite
hand and the most loveable little foot in the world. Somehow
or other it chanced that Henry Irvine and she had once met, the year
before, and from that period, young as they both were, a silent,
unspoken
,
but increasing mutual passion, sprung up in their hearts.
At sunset of the day on which the events just related had
transpired
,
Mary was seated in a little favorite bower, at the foot of the
garden
,
that looked upon the water, and from which was a view of the
village, spread out before her like a picture, when she descried a boat,
containing two persons, put off from the opposite side of the lake, and
rapidly approach the spot where she was seated. A glance at the form
of the individual in the stern told her that it was none other than
Henry; while in the broad shoulders and shaggy bare head of the
oarsman, she could not fail to recognize his inseparable companion,
Davy Dow. Scarce had the boat touched the snowy beach, ere Mary,
who flew to meet it, was in the arms of Henry. They walked
together
silently for a few moments, beneath the water-oaks that overhung
the winding shore, when, after they had retired a little apart from
observation, Henry, who, to Mary's surprise, had remained moody as
well as silent, and wholly forgetful of his usual lightness of spirits,
stopped suddenly, and impressively said to her:
`Mary, I have come to bid you good bye.'
`Henry!' was the exclamation that escaped her lips at this
announcement
.
`It is true. I leave Eden with the dawn.'
`Whither?'
`To seek my fortuneand, in after years to return, if you will then
have proved true to me, to claim you, dare I say it, as my bride!'
He warmly pressed her to his heart as he spoke, and looked
anxiously
into her face for a reply
For a moment, the gentle girl remained silent. The suddenness
of the announcement had stunned her, and she was incapable of
speaking
.
At length recovering her usual manner, she said
playfully
:
`You say so but to try my affection, Henry. If this is all you wish,
although I ought not to humor you, I will frankly tell you that my love,
young as we both are, shall never meet with a change.'
`Your father?'
`With his approval, always, Henry.'
`But the wealthy Colonel Odlin will never approve the love of a
poor lad, unknown to birth and fortune.'
`My father will ever seek the happiness of his only child Henry;
and my happiness never will be sacrificed even to his own pride of
birth and fortune.'
`Yet thrice has he forbidden me to speak and have you forgotten
Mary, when he so rudely thrust me one side, at the church door, when
I offered to assist you in descending from the carriage?'
`Speak not this now'twas a hasty act. I wish to learn what you
mean by saying you have come to bid me farewell?'
`It needs no explanation. I have struck the master a blow, and
the whole village has risen against me. Even my good foster mother,
if I may call her such, has forbidden me the shelter of her roof, until
I have asked the tyrant's pardon.'
`And you will not?'
`And I will not.'
`I am very sorry this has chanced! You have been inprudent and
over-hasty, I fear, Henry. Your temper is too quick to take fire at
every spark that comes in contact with it. What could have provoked
you to so rash a thing! Sacrilege would scarce have been a greater
crime in the eyes of the villagers.'
`He bade me take offbut no, I will not speak of it,' he said
blushing with mingled shame and indignation, `let it suffice, Mary,
that he insulted me, and I struck him.'
`That 'a did, Miss Mary,' said Davy, who had approached them
unperceived, `and I hut un a dig i' the ribs, too, that knock'd the wind
oot 'o the body on un. Young Measter Henry was right, and had he
no' licked the Measter, I fegs! I'd a felt mighty like lickin' Henry
myself, savin' your presence, Miss Mary; and so I came to tell yees
yer father is coomin doon the walk, and might'nt altogetheryer
know Master Henry' here Davy completed his intelligence with a
wink and a hieroglyphical screwing up of his face that was easily
interpreted
by the lovers.
`I must leave you dearest,' said Henry quickly. Go and shove off
the boat, Davy. Farewell Mary, dear Mary,' he would have said more,
but the fullness of his heart impeded utterance.
`Whither do you go, Henry?' she asked, lifting her face wet with
tears, from his shoulder.
`To Philapelphia, to carve out my own fortunesto accomplish
something, dearest girl, to make me worthy of you. Will you love
me while I am absent?'
`Love you, Henry dearest! how can you doubt me?'
`Will you promise, then, to wait for me seven years? If you do
not hear from me then either for good or for evil, you shall then be
free.
`I promise to be yours and none other's while life lasts,' she
replied
earnestly.
`I ask only for seven years. Will you promise?'
`promise,' she said fervently and affectionately.
`God bless you, then, Mary! I shall have something to cheer my
exile. I shall not return until Colonel Odlin, haughty as he is,
shall take me by the hand with pride, and in that hand place the
trembling
little member I now clasp in it. Adieu, adieu, dearest. When
you next hear from me it will be with honor. Only be true to
me.'
`Do you see those twin stars, just appearing in the evening sky?
they shall be emblems of our love. Look at them often, when absent
far from me, and doubt it not!'
A hasty embracea passionate kissthe first he had ever placed
upon her sweet mouth, and they had parted. The boat containing the
fading figure of Henry shot rapidly across the lake, while Mary
turning
to meet her parent, joined him before he reached the bottom of
the avenue, or had described them, and returned with him sllently and
sadly towards the house.
CHAPTER IV.
It was known throughout the village, long before the close of the
succeeding day, that Henry Irvine had suddenly and secretly departed
from his native village, no one knew whither: and thereupon great
was the triumph of Dominie Spankie and his adherents. It would
occupy more space than we have allowed ourselves in the compass of
this sketch, to recount the adventures of the high spirited boy ere he
fairly entered the path by which he was to travel onward to fortune,
fame, and felicity. He arrived in Philadelphia pennyless and
friendless
,
without definite aim or object, resting his hopes of success
solely
on the confused, but too frequent erroneous notion, common with
the country lads of his native state, that there, and there alone he could
make his fortune. Aside from his own peculiar case, far better, indeed,
would it have been now for thousands of such if they had staid at
home to till the soil or labor at the bench of the mechanic.
With a small pack lashed to his back, a staff in his hand, and his
garments travel-worn and dusty, he entered the city by the Schuylkill
bridge, an hour before sunset of the third day after his departure from
Eden; and after winding through several streets, he found himsel
lounging down the great thoroughfore of Chestnut street, staring at
the numerous gay signs and novel sights that every where met his
rustic gaze; the while diligently pondering in his mind which of the
countless means of livelihood in which he saw the citizens engaged,
he should select, and make the first step towards the accomplishment
of his high objects. As he gazed into the dazzling windows of a
jeweller's shop, he thought he should like to be a jeweller; but he
thought of Col. Odlin, and shook his head. `He will never give his
daughter to a mechanic!' was his mental language. `Yet why should
he not?' was the question that irrestibly forced itself upon his
ingenuous
mind. `Should I not still be Henry Irvine, whether I were a
mechanic or a merchant?' He could not answer his own query; and
being puzzled by the nice distinctions that society has formed, he
turned from the showy window and continued his walk. `Shall I be
a storekeeper?' he inquired, as he observed the well-dressed young
men that were selling silks and muslins across mahogony counters to
beautiful women. He watched them with an observing air, for a few
seconds, and then turning away, said, `No, I feel within me that I
am destined for a more manly and a far higher destiny, than I see this
to be.'
`Thus, in turn, every pursuit offered itself, for the passing moment
to his choice, and each, in turn, as it was presented, was mentally
rejected. At length a small, unassuming sign, caught his attention,
on which he read in gilded characters, R.
Peale, Portrait
Painter
.
The last words arrested his eye, and he repeated them aloud,
while a glow of surprise and pleasure lighted up his countenance.
After
surveying the sign fixedly a few seconds, as if his glance fascinated,
he struck the end of his staff energetically upon the pavement, and
exclaimed, `I will become a painter!'
`Will you, my lad?' said a pleasant voice near him.
He looked up with surprise, and saw a middle aged gentleman,
with a gold headed cane in his hand, and a benovolent, yet highly
intellectual
countenance, standing in the door and gazing on him with
that friendly air and look of interest which is so readily translated and
appreciated by a stranger among strangers. Henry blushed on finding
himself so particularly the object of attention, and stammered
something
he knew not what, in his confusion; but instantly recovering
himself, encouraged by the kind manner of the gentleman, he
repeated
,
with modest firmness:
`Yes sir, I would like to become a painter.'
`Come into my studio, then. Perhaps you would be pleased to look
at some of the paintings there.'
`With the greatest pleasure in the world, sir,' said Henry, while
his face beamed with gratitude and delight.
He then quickly followed him into an upper room, which was lined
on every side with dark green cloth; and he observed that the only
light it received came in through the top of a single window, which
to subdue its strength and properly temper it, was covered with fine
white tissue paper, notwithstanding the softened character of the light
and the smallness of the aperture, it did not escape him that it was
so managed as far better to show what was in the room, than the
glare of noon-day from many windows could do. The apartment was
hung round with pictures, more in number than Henry before believed
were in the whole world put together; and, for a few moments after
entering, he remained silent, with mingled wonder and astonishment.
A new creation seemed to have broken upon him. He at first looked
about wholly bewildered. Gradually, at length, he grew familiarized
with the scene, and wandered from picture to picture with that reverent
delight which true genius, in such a situation, alone can experience.
The benevolent painter watched him, with a gratified smile on his
benign
countenance; and after enjoying for some time the
unsophisticated
rapture of the rustic youth, a thought seemed suddenly to strike
him; for going to a corner of the room, he drew from a pile of dusty
paintings, an old piece of canvass, on which was painted an unfinished
head of St. John by Michael Angelo, and, as if by accident, placed it
in the range of his vision. Henry glanced at the old painting, an
instant
,
and was about to pass on to a fresh and brilliant picture, by a
modern artist, when something in the head arrested his attention. He
stopped and gazed upon it steadily for a few seconds, and with
increasing
wonder; and while he looked, his eye lighted up with the fire of
enthusiasmthe blood leaped to his templeshis breath came and
went quick, and finally, clasping his hands together, he bent forward
in the involuntary attitude of adoration; then, as if gradually
over-come
by the presence of the spirit of genius, he slowly dropped upon
one knee, and said in tones of awe:
`
It is the work of God and not of man!
'
The painter awed by the wonderful impression the head had made
upon the boy, struck by the extraordinary language he had given
utterance
to, and affected by the sublimity of the whole scene, gazed
upon him for a moment with wonder and admiration; then springing
forward, he caught him in his embrace, and burst into tears. `The
Spirit of God is in the child!' he cried, `and Heaven has directed thy
wandering footsteps hither. Henceforward we will part not till the
pupil shall have excelled the master.'
CHAPTER V.
Seven years had nearly passed away since the departure of Henry
Irvine from his native village, when one morning, at the breakfast
table
,
Colonel Odlin, as was his custom, opened his newspaper, the old
`Philadelphia Gazette,' which came to him in those days, regularly
once a week, and prepared leisurely to discuss it over coffee: an
Epicuerean
method of breakfasting, to which retired old gentlemen,
particularly
if they have been in the army, are much given. Mary, his
blooming daughter-sat opposite, presiding over the coffee-urn. She
was now in the ripeness of her beauty; and in her lovely face and
form, all that the bud had promised was realized. She had continued
to cherish her young love for Henry, absence serving rather to
strengthen
rather than diminish it; yet, from the evening he had parted with
her on the shore of the little lake, she had received from him no
intelligence
whatever. But, with a true woman's constancy and hope,
measuring his love by her own, she felt assured that wherever he was,
he continued faithful, and would, within the time he had promised,
return to claim her hand.
`I wonder who this young American painter can be, who makes so
much noise in the world,' said Colonel Odlin, pushing back his
spectacles
and laying down the paper beside him, while he drank his
coffee
.
`I scarcely, of late, take up a newspaper that I do not find an
eulogium on this young artist. Really, I am proud of my country,
girl,' he continued, with animation; `we shall yet, believe me, give
lessons to England both in the arts and literature as well as we have
already done in arms.'
The attention of Mary was immediately awakened; for all mystery
connected with young aspirrnts for fame, had an interest for her; her
thoughts, moreover, were at that moment, running on her absent lover
and his probable career, and the words of her father, indifferent as
they would have been to an ordinary listener, instantly roused her
curiosity
.
`Do you mean that extraordinary genius, who is now in England?'
she asked with assumed carelessness
`Who else, child? I am proud of him, and his country should be
proud of him. She should welcome him with open arms when he
returns
!
What class of men reflect such glory on an age and country
as painters? They are the pet children of genius, and their pathway,
above that of all other men, is heavenward, and honor and glory
encompass
them in their upward flight, like a shining cloud. Listen to
this, and see if it does not cause your American blood to mount to
your brow with national pride!' and setting his glasses to suit his
vision
,
the ardent old soldier read aloud from the Gazette, the following
paragraph:
`We learn with great pleasure that Peale's celebrated pupil, whose
brilliant career we have often had occasion to allude to in our
columns
,
has at length left Rome, where by the force of genius alone
for to birth and parentage we learn he owes nothing, both being alike
involved in obscurityhe has held rank with nobles and princes, and
from all classes received the homage due to his commanding talents.
The London paper from which we obtain our information, also says,
that `it having been his intention to return somewhat leisurely from
Italy to the United States, he has taken England in his way, where,
his fame having preceded him, he has drawn from their Majesties the
most flattering personal attention. At their command, he has
consented
to delay his departure for America, until he has taken portraits,
not only of their Majesties, but of the whole royal family. The Duke
of Sussex and the Earl of Wellesley, both sat to him in Rome, some
months since, of whom he has taken most extraordinary likenesses,
the truth of which is only surpassed by the spirit and beauty of the
execution
.
These will be, in a few days, placed in the royal gallery:
We congratulate this distinguished young painter's countrymen on the
possession of an artist of such high merit, and console ourselves that
genius belongs to no land nor realm; but, inasmuch as its empire is
over the intellect, so is its dwelling place only limited by the
boundaries
that confine the immortal mind. We learn that it is his intention
to return to America as soon as he shall have fulfilled his present
engagemens
to their majesties.'
`There, my daughter, is a man whom men should delight to honor.
The title genius has given him is a far nobler one than the noblest the
patent of a king can confer.'
Mary assented in her heart to these sentiments of her father, but
did not open her lips, for her thoughts were busy, her ideas confused
her hopes, feelings, wishes, all in commotion. His name,
strangely
enough, was not given in the paper, and the impression singularly
and unaccountably forced itself, each moment increasing in strength
upon her mind, that the young painter was the exiled Henry. At
length as thought built itself on thought it almost reached positive
conviction in her mind. `If you hear of me, it will be with honor!'
She remembered these parting words, and also called to mind that
talent for sketching which had been the cause of their separation.
`Oh, if it should indeed be Henry!' and the ambition of her love
which would give its object no inferior station among men, whispered
her to cherish the hope.
CHAPTER VI.
Three months elapsed after the breakfast scene, described in the
last chapter, about dusk, one Sabbath evening, two persons might
have been seen in close conference beside the hedge under the window
of the humble cottage of the Widow Dow. The figure of one was
partly concealed by the foliage, but a close veil and a large shawl
thrown across the shoulders as if for disguise, betrayed it to be a
female
.
Through all her attempts at concealment, however, there shone
a certain feminine grace, which, with a particularly neat foot, and a
hall visible snowy hand betrayed her rank to be above that of a village
maiden. Her companion was a stout, good-looking young
countryman
,
in the plain and homespun garb of a ploughman.
`It is my wish, Davy,' said she, as if enforcing some request, and
it is for his sake, too, that it is to be done.'
`Yes, Miss Mary; but it may not turn out to be young Measter
Irvine, after all,' responded Davy Dow, whom the lapse of seven years
had little changed, save in stature and breadth of shoulders.
`I know that it is he, Davy,' said Mary Odlin, with confidence;
`the newspaper that came this morning, after stating that this
distinguished
painter had returned to Philadelphia and taken a studio in
Chestnut street, describes, in one short paragraph his personal
appearance
,
and it is just that of Henry as my fancy would paint him as
being. My heart tells me that none but himself could have sat for
the picture. You must go, Davy.'
`Well, Miss Mary, I love Measter Irvine, thof I haint seen un for
seven years, as much as I did the day I holped him thrash the
Dominie
.
You must make all right with old measther here, if I go, Miss
Mary, and I'm off; and, I fegs, if he be doon to the city I'll hunt him
out, and give him the letter and ring; and I don't know which will
make him most glad to see me or get a letter from you. I'm most
sartain both on us coming together'll go noigh on to upset him.'
`You are the kind, obliging, good creature I ever thought you were,
Davy. Be speedy, and only be successful, and I will not only reward
you well, but do all in my power to forward your suit with my maid,
Bessy.
`He, ge, ge! you knows it, Miss Mary, do ye? Well, it's truth: I
does love un, and if ye can only make her say yes, some Sunday night,
when I pops the question, it 'ill be all the reward I want for going.
So I'll be up and off by the dawn, and thoff it's a pretty smart chance
of a road, I'll make Snowy pace it in less than two days.'
`Don't be imprudent, Davy, mind, and see that no one knows your
business nor from whom you are going. Steal away before day break
and I will take care that Dame Dow be made easy in your absence.
Here is silver to defray your expenses. Do not forget now, on your
arrival in the city, to visit, as I before told you, every painter's room
until you discover him: his face you cannot have forgotten, and
seven
years will have altered it little save by the addition of manly
graces
.
Now, God speed thee and give thee success in thy errand.'
She retreated, as she spoke, hastily, down the green lane, at the end
of which is a rustic bridge, that crosses the stream before it empties
itself into the mere, by which she reached Rosemont again without
detection.
The ensuing morning, at day-break, our Mercury, Davy Dow,
stole from his rude bed to the stable, and speedily saddled a
diminutive
,
bob-tailed, crow-black pony, of no particular breed, which he
had perversely christened Snowball or Snowy. He then placed across
his back a pair of saddle-bags, well filled with meat, bread, apples and
dough-nuts, and mounting him, after he had carefully secured the
stable-door, he was soon trotting briskly past the school-house, where
Dominie Spankie still continued to reign more terrible than ever; and
just as the sun began to flush the eastern skies, he turned into the
turnpike at the spot where the venerable finger-board points back to
Eden, and, at a vigorous pace, pursued his way towards the
metropolis
.
CHAPTER VII.
The third day after the departure of Davy, on his Quixotic
expedidition
,
the several artists of Philidelphia were thrown into amusing
consternation by the apparation of a clownish young countryman,
wearing a homespun frock, and hob-nail shoes, and carrying a small
cart-whip, deliberately stalking into their studios, and without casting
a glance upon the works of art around, approaching, and looking them
as closely in the countenance as they themselves had ever done sitters;
and then with a negative shake of the head, quietly disappearing
without having spoken a word.
Early in the afternoon of the same day, a certain young painter of
that city was seated in his studio, which, though a plain green room,
and containing but few pictures for display, was situated in the most
fashionable part of the town. His head was covered with a crimson
Turkish cap; a gorgeous oriental dressing gown enveloped his manly
and elegant person, and his feet were thrust into Indian slippers,
richly
embroidered with bead-work. He had just dismissed a fair sitter,
and was still seated before his easel, contemplating the beautiful
pictures
that had risen beneath the magical touches of his pencil. While
thus occupied, the door opened softly, and first the head, and then the
shoulders, of a countryman, were thrust in. The owner of these
after
taking a survey of the room, then advanced his whole body, and
slowly approached the artist, as if to obtain a sight of his features,
which were hidden by the canvas before him, and which he was so
intently
studying as to be unconscious of the presence of an intruder.
The countryman, who was Davy Dow, in proper person, at length, by
thrusting his head over the top of the canvas, got sight of the
painter's
face. It was shaded to the eyes by the drooping fold of his
velvet
cap, and partly covered by his right palm and fore-finger, on which
his cheek thoughtfully leaned. Davy looked hard and scrutinizingly,
but the singularity of his costume, with the attitude, defeated his
scrutiny. But he was not to be foiled in his object, and it occurred
to him that there was something in the shape of the symmetrical and
gentlemanly hand that reminded him of his foster-brotherfor the
expression
of
the hand
so to express that which all have noticed, is
the last to change. In his anxiety to get a better view of the face, he
struck his foot against a limb of the easel. The artist started, and
looking up, beheld, to his infinite surprise, the broad visage of Davy
staring down upon him over the top of the picture. The instant
Davy
saw his face, browned and manly, yet about the forehead and
eyes almost transparent with intellect, the lip darkened by a
moustache
,
and the face classically oval, with parted hair, flowing to the
shoulders, from beneath his cap, he started in his turn. In it his
duller
vision saw no trace of the fair boy that shared his sports in
childhood
.
`Dang it, he be a Turk and no Christian!' he ejaculated, after
surveying
him a few seconds; being bewildered by the picturesque
costume
as well as confused by the stern, inquiring look that sought his.
`What, sir?' demanded the artist, not comprehending Davy's
words.
`Nothing, your worship. It is of no sort o' consequencea bit o'
a mistakeinto the wrong shop, sirno offence, I hope, sir!' and
thus speaking, Davy bowed himself backwards as for as the door, and
then made his escape from the room with extraordinary precipitation.
The artist gave a few moments' thought to the oddity of the
interruption
,
and then taking up his pencil, began to work upon the
picture
,
touching and adding grace to each feature, and blending in the
higher parts of expression from memory. These touches were more
delicate and truthful than those which he had mechanically copied
from the face of the sitter; for fancy and taste combined with the
restless spirit of creating the beautiful, will then always insensibly
guide the artist's pencil, and mingle themselves with his colors.
After
a while, he stopped abruptly, and spoke half aloud, his mind
having
evidently dwelt on the recent circumstances while his pencil
moved over his canvas.
`Certainly, I have seen that broad, honest face before. Where can
I have encountered its owner?' He seemed to be recalling the past
for a moment, and then shook his head sorrowfully.
`Ah, gentle Mary! I wonder if you have continued true to me!
Two days longer this picture will detain me here, and I will then know
in person. In disguise will I revisit my native village, and from her
own lips, myself unknown to her, draw the evidence of her truth or
unfaithfulness!How strange it is that the face of this clown should
bring Eden so vividly to memory. I have, at length, gained a name,
Colonel Odlin need not be ashamed to acknowledge. I know his
passion and taste for the fine arts. I trust much to this for success,
if Mary should have proven true. I wonder if she has altered much?'
As he spoke, he rose, and removing the canvas from the easel,
replaced
it by a half finished portrait, the original of which could not
be mistaken.
`How like her as she was when we last met!' he said,
contemplating
with a lover's gaze, the fair resemblance of Mary Odlin. `
Perhaps
she is much altered now, but it is only to be still lovelier.' He
continued to gaze awhile longer on the picture which he had sketched,
of Mary in the bloom of sweet sixteen as she was pictured on his
memory, and then, rising, threw aside his gown and cap, replaced
them with a coat and hat, and after another passionate glance at the
the portrait, replaced it by the one he had removed, and descended
to the street. As he passed out of the door to the pavement, he saw
his late visitor, standing with his face close to his sigh, which he was
spelling over and over again, with great care,
Henry, Portrait and Historical Painter
.'
`That's half o' the name, and no mistake. It may be him and it
mayn't be! but dang me if he didn't look like a Turk up there. But
the chap I see might not ha' been the painter. `Henry!
Henry
!
I wonder if he ha'n't got no pitcher to his handle! Henry what?
May be its Mr. Henry. Gad! I'll go in again, after I have been
round to the Indian Queen tavern, and got a snack, for its nigh on to
three o'clock, and I ha'n't had no dinner yet. If it's Mr. Henry,
'ta'n't Master Henry, that's all. But its so pesky near it, I'll give
another trial. For none o' the other painters look any more like
Henry
than me old grandmother.'
There was something in the tones and manner of the speaker, that
arrested the painter's attention. He involuntarily stopped and was
about to address him, when Davy strode away beyond his reach, and
doubtless, very soon afterwards was regaling himself at the inn, with
bread, cheese, and dough-nuts. Two hours afterwards, on returning
to his room, which, as most artists are wont to do, he had left
unlocked
,
he discovered, seated in his chair before the easel, and gazing
with looks of surprise and gratification upon the sitter's portrait he
had replaced there, no less person than his former rustic visitor. He
surveyed him a moment with a smile, and then approaching him,
slapped him good humoredly on the back, and said:
`You seem to be fond of paintings, my good friend!'
`Noa, measter, not particularly,' said Davy, quietly looking up
from the canvas; `Ise ony waitin' here for the painter.'
The voice and face of the speaker brought back to the artist his
boyhood. He scanned his features with eager curiosity, as if he
sought to trace there familiar lines. But the tan of the sun and the
seasons, combined with a heavy beard, defeated his scrutiny. Davy,
in his turn, stared at the painter, his face alternately lighted up with
hope, and clouding with doubt, as at one moment he thought he
detected
a resemblance, which, the next instant, was replaced by an
expression
altogether strange to him. On the part of the young
painter
,
conviction grew to certainty, that an old companion of boyhood
stood before him: but, as if prompted by a sudden thought, which
suggested a plan for the better confirmation of his suspicions, he
removed
the picture from the easel, and silently, with a half smile,
replaced
it by one covered by a cloth, which hitherto had stood
against the wall, and then said:
`I was about to ask your name, my good friend; for your face
reminds
me most forcibly, of one I knew in my boyhood; but I chose
to satisfy myself by means of my art. Look at this picture,' he added,
removing the cover; `if you recognize it, I think I shall not be at a
a loss to call you by name without asking it. Stand here before it!'
Davy took the position he pointed out, and had no sooner fastened
his eyes upon the canvas, then they seemed to start from their
sockets
with mingled surprise and bodily fear. He stepped back, again
advanced, and then bent his face closer to it as if scarcely believing
his eyes for wonder; finally, he stooped down before it, with both
hands, from one of which stuck out the handle of his inseparable cart
whip, resting on his thighs, and gazed upon it until a broad smile
of amusing recognition, illumined her ruddy visage. Near him, with
his pencil extended in one hand, and his pallette elevated in the other,
stood the painter, watching every expression in his face, and enjoying
in triumph, the anticipated success of his art.
All at once, Davy drew back, and doubling his massy fist, said,
while he shook it at the canvas, `If thee beest no' Dominie Spankie,
thee beest the dev'l!' Then turning and looking at the amused artist,
he added, `There be but one could do that, and if thee beest not
not Measter Henry'
`Then,' interrupted the Artist, smiling; `thou art not Davy Dow.'
`Odds butters! Bessy's mine, Bussy's mine!' he cried, capering
round the studio. `Give us thee hand, Measter Henry! Dod! it's
thyself after all, then! How thee hast shot up; and the tan has
made thee brown as a hazle-nut; and what with that whisker on your
upper lip, I'd barely know'd thee, but for the Dominie, here. I know'd
nobody could ha' done him but you. Well, it's odd, the old chap's
picture should ha' made you go off, at first, and then be the means o'
making me find you again.'
The two friends cordially shook hands, and Henry passed one of
the pleasantest hours since his exile in reviving old associations with
the communicative Davy. That Mary formed the burden of the
numerous
questions he put to his foster-brother, need not be told. At
length, Davy began to feel in the capacious pockets of his frock as if
suddenly recollecting that he had not delivered all his message `Dang
it, Measter Henry, what with talking 'bout the Dominie, and the gals,
and the old women, I'd loike to a' forgot! Here's a bit of a letter
and a round gold ring for ye!'
Henry seiezed them with eagerness, while a heightened color
betrayed
the state of his heart. He kissed the silent token, and placed
it on his finger, and then tore open the letter. It contained but a
single word:
`
Come
.
`
Mary
.'
`I obey!' he exclaimed. `How do you go back, Davy?'
`On Snowy. He's at the tavern, and if you'll ride him, Measter
Henry, I'll foot it along side, bad as I feel to get back to Eden to
see Bessy.'
`No thank you, good Davy. I will take the stage. You can
return
at once, and bear this seal to her, and'
`To Bessy?'
`To Bessy! No, you ninnyto Mary.'
He gave, as he spoke to Davy, a small signet, in which was cut the
metto, `
My heart is with you
.' `Tell her in three days I shall be at
Rosemont.' In a few minutes afterwards, Davy took his leave, and
by sun-rise the next morning, was several miles on his way to Eden,
the image of his Bessy filled his thoughts and added speed to his
progress.
CHAPTER VIII.
The
day after Davy's secret departure, on his search for Henry,
whom he so happily discovered, Colonel Odlin received a letter
relating
to some financial matters, that required his presence for a few
days in the city. He immediately left Rosemont, accompanied by his
daughter, and arrived the evening of the day on which Davy left,
without having met him on the road. Instead of going to the Indian
Queen, then the most respectable inn, (not
hotel
,) of the town, they
drove directly to the residence of an old friend who had recently been
united to a very lovely woman, and lived in much style in Walnut
street. The portrait on which Henry was at work when Davy first
entered his studio, was that of Mrs. Astley. It chanced to be the
subject of conversation the next morning at the breakfast table, and
the highest encomiums were passed by the Dr. and Mrs. Astley, not
only upon it as a likeness and work of art, but upon the painter.
`Who is he?' asked Colonel Odlin, with interest.
`The American Angelo.'
`What, the celebrated young American painter, who has recently
been received with such distinction in England?'
`The same,' replied Dr. Astley. `It is but a few weeks since he
returned to this country; and it is only at the request of several of
our most eminent citizens, and even of General Washington, who is
3
to sit to him, that he has consented to remain with us a few days;
being
anxious to visit his native village, somewhere in the interior of the
state. You must see him, and get your head taken off,' added the
doctor laughing.
`I will accompany you and the ladies to his rooms, this morning,
before I go to the bank. I have great curiosity to form his
acquaintance
.
His country should be proud of him.'
`Ay, indeed, should they,' responded the Doctor; `but look at my
fair friend Mary! Her face glows with something like pride in him
already. Why girl, you would fall in love with him at sight! He is
not a bad favored young gentleman, by any means. Who knows,
Colonel
,
what may happen? A man who has raised himself to be the
associate of princes and nobles of Europe, simply by the aid of his
genius, may be a match for any woman.
`I should be honored by such a son-in-law,' said Colonel Odlin,
smiling, and looking towards Mary. She felt confused and
distressed
,
why, she scarcely knew; and felt relieved when the party rose
from the table. She was not sure that the painter was Henry. She
darred not ask Dr. Astley his name; still her love would not let her
doubt, and so she believed.
CHAPTER VIII.
Henry Irvine was seated in his studio that morning, busily at work.
On the easel before him stood a piece of canvas, on which he had
been painting for several hours, with the animated and glowing
countenance
of one whose soul was lost in the subject. The door opened,
and the party from Dr. Astley's entered. Observing him so deeply
absorbed in his task, they did not interrupt him, but lounged through the
room, inspecting the creations of his pencil, and admiring some
pictures
of the old master of painting which he had brought from
from Italy, leaving him to discover their presence at his leisure. Mary
Odlin leaned upon the arm of Dr. Astley as they traversed the room
but from a singular feeling, easily understood but difficult to analyze
she dared not turn her eyes towards the artist. A single glance she
knew would satisfy her if it was Henry; but she felt it might also
crush at once the hopes she had so fondly cherished. She trembled
at hastening the denouement, and chose rather to nourish the delusion,
if delusion it was, to the latest moment, than risk the chance of final
disappointment. She feared, too, if it should prove to be Henry, to
meet his eye before so many, and her emotion at the discovery should
be observed.
As they slowly made the tour of the apartment, Mrs. Astley, whose
curiosity was awakened to know whether it could be her own picture
that so closely engaged the whole mind of the handsome young artist
as to render him unconscious of their presence, crossed the room in
such a direction, that by slightly bending forward, she could discover
the subjecton the canvas. Her eye had scarcely glanced at it,
when she uttered an exclamation of surprise and delight, and cried,
`The living image of Mary Odlin, as I knew her when she was
scarce sixteen!'
He started with surprise, blushed, stammered out a few incoherent
words of spology for not before aware of their presence, and hastily
turned the canvas to the easelbut not before Colonel Odlin had
seen and recognized an admirable portrait of his daughter, just as she
was merging into womanhood. Mary heard the words of Mrs. Astley,
and her heart told her that the limner could be none other than
Henry
!
She raised her eyes
it was Henry!
She uttered a cry of
delight
,
and would have fallen with joy, had not the young artist, who
at the same instant recognized her, flown and caught her in his arms.
The moment she felt his arms around her, she quickly recovered
herself
with maidenly shame, and buried her blushing, happy face in her
hands!
`What means this?' inquired Colonel Odlin, bewildered by the
scene, wholly at loss to account for his daughter's emotion, and
puzzling
himself with conjectures how her portrait came to be on the
painter's easel.
`Cupid has something to do it, Colonel, I will wager,' said Dr.
Astley, with a mischevous glance at Mary. `Did I not tell, you, fair
lady, it would be love at first sight!'
`It is something more,' said Colonel Odlin; `will you do us the
kindness to explain, sir?' he added, addressing Henry
`Cheerfully sir,' said Henry taking the hand of Mary, which she
willingly resigned to him. `In early youth your lovely daughter was
beloved by me, and I had reason to hope my love was reciprocated.
But my birth is humble, and also were my fortunes. That I might
make myself worthy of her, seven years ago I left my native village,
to seek my fortune, and strive to win a name, in the lustre of which,
whispered my youthful ambition, my lowly one should be lost. For
that purpose, I assumed only my christian name, with the
determination
to resume my paternal one only when I could with honor confer
it on her, who was the guiding star of my career. Seven years we
promised to be true to each other, trusting to better fortunes, at the
expiration of that period, to reward our loves. It is just seven years
to-day, sir, since we parted, on the shore of Eden Mere.'
`In Henry, the painter,' exclaimed Colonel Odlin, with
astonishment
,
`I then behold'
`Henry Irvine,' replied the young artist, bowing with modest
pride.
`Take her, young man. She is fairly won. Yours is a patent of
nobility derived from Heaven, and sealed with the signet of a
Divinity
.
Nor are you so lowly by birth. Your father though a poor
clergyman
,
was a gentleman and a scholar!'
As he spoke, he took the hand of the happy Mary and placed it
himself in that of her lover, embraced them both, and in an
affectionate
manner bade, `God bless them!'
`Amen!' fervently responded Dr. Astley.
A few weeks afterwards, the village of Eden was beside itself with
merry-makings in honor of the marriages of Henry Irvine with Mary
Odlin, and of David Dow with Bessy Blodget.
THE END
.
THE BOLD INSURGENT.
CHAPTER I.
`Death keep him close
We have too many Divells still goe loose.
Bacon's Eulogy
.
Scene in the Tap-Room
.
In
the reign of Charles, the Second of England, Sir William
Berkley
was Governor of Virginia, then a pet province of royalty, and
receiving
more of the sunshine of kingly favor than any other of the
American plantations. It was settled principally by cavaliers of this
prince's ill-fated father's court, and a party, who, to escape the
retributive
vengeance of Cromwell, sought here an asylum from the
politcal
tempest that laid waste their fair island. Here took refuge many
of the first Charles' personal friends and most devoted adherents; and
with but few exceptions, all of these transferred their royalty and
affection
from the father to the son. After the restoration, they would
have willingly returned from their exile, and were making
preparations
to do so, when the second Charles, desirous of giving
consideration
to the province through the presence there of wealth and
family
,
courteously signified that it was his royal wish that they should
remain there, and by their presence and influence, countenance the
infant colony, which, on their departure, would languish and die.
The expression of the royal desire was to them a command; and
Virginial
became permanently the home of some of the best descended
cavaliers of Great Britain, whose descendants, in this day, have
parted
not with the high tone of gallantry and chivalrous bearing which
characterized the gentleman of the court of the unfortunate Charles.
The presence of so large a number of good families, who instead of
coming to acquire wealth, brought it with them with all its refinements,
combined with the peculiar favor the colony received from the parent
country, contributed to place Virginia far before its sister colonies in
luxuries which the latter only finally arrived to the enjoyment of, after
years of patient and laborious toil. This peculiarity was apparent,
and distinctly marked as early as the period of our story; and a
century
and a half has scarcely diminished the claim of the `Old
Dominion'
to this distinctive feature.
The colonists were composed principally of planters, gentlemen of
estate, King's officers, military men, with the persons composing the
council and court of Sir William Berkley. Mechanics, there were
few or none, as all manufactured articles were imported from the
mother country, from a hat down to a shoe, and oftentimes, also, the
entire frames of dwelling houses and public edifices. Poor white
laborers
were also rare, as all work was done by slaves.
Loafers
were
not known then. It was emphatically a colony of gentlemen! Their
estates extended on both sides of James River, many a league, and
along both shores of the Chesapeake. Jamestown was the seat of
colonial government, the residence of Sir William Berkley; and the
centre of all provincial events. Here the governor held his court;
here met the assembly, and here were the head-quarters of the troops.
This town, at the period of our story, in 1675, extended along a
rambling street that run parallel with James, then called Powhattan
River, for about three quarters of a mile, and faced the south. The
place on which it was built, was a peninsula formed by a creek, that,
approaching within a few rods of James River, above the town,
turned
with a broad sweep, off suddenly to the left, quite encompassing
the town, and emptied itself into the river two miles below it. The
neck that joined the peninsula thus formed, to the main land, was but
ten paces in breadth, and across it run the only road that led from the
town to the interior. Besides the state-house, which was an
imposing
brick structure, with a portico and gallery, the governor's
residence
,
just out of the village, and a church with a lower tower, there
was no other public building in town, unless the hostel of Katrine
Larence be thus designated. Katrine had been the prettiest maiden,
the loveliest bride, and the handsomest widow in the whole plantation.
At the time this story opens, she had remained in widowhood twelve
years, the whilst mistress and hostess of the most notable public
house in Virginia; `the resorte,' says the historian, `of all the
gentry
and best quality of the colony whom business and cencours to the
governor brought to town from all parts.'
One stormy night, several of her guests were congregated in the
tap-room, the chief window of which looked towards the council hall
of the state-house. It was the night before the meeting of the
provincial
assembly, and the inn was filled with the members that
represented
different parts of the colony, and, as the custom then was,
most of them were gathered in the tap-room after supper, previous
to retiring for the night. The company was divided or separated into
four or five groups. Around the fire, (for the night, though a late
one, was damp and chilly, and a fire comfortable,) was drawn a knot
of the members, discussing the anticipated affairs of the morrow, on
the opening of the assembly. They were mostly dressed in the broad
skirted coats, flapped waistcoats, breeches and knee-buckles, with the
queued and powdered hair of the period. In the middle of the floor,
seated around a table, was a group of town's people, from their dress
and conversation, evidently merchants and ship-masters, talking of
gains, of winds, and of foreign lands. In a corner of the apartment
were several seamen, riotously drinking and singing over oft
replenished
cups of gin or claret, while in the opposite corner, as if
seeking
to shun observation, were two swarthy and painted Indians, with
bundles of furs at their feet, bargaining in low guttural tones with a
little fat, shrewd `leader' of the town, who displayed, in his hands, gay
beads, brass rings, and other tempting trinkets, as the price of their
beaver-skins. On one side of the long, low apartment, was a
semicircular
pulpit, well guarded by an oaken lattice, and communicating
with a window in the rear, with an inner room. This was the `bar'
or `tap' of the inn, and its presiding deity none other than Katrine
herself, who was leaning over its counter, and talking with a tall
handsome man, not above thirty years of age, who, while listening to
her with courteous attention, was marking all that passed among the
several groups in the tap-room. This man was finely formed, and
wore a costume half that of a hunter, and half military, which
exceedingly
became him, while it set off to advantage the firm
proportions
of his well built frame. His whole air, his subdued and calm
manner, as well as the richness of some parts of his dress, showed
him to be a man of birth and bearing. His eye was grey and large,
and clear like an eagle's, while his mouth wore that firm expression
that indicated courage, daring, and a high and fierce spirit. His
complexion
was florid, his forehead partly shaded by a low Virginia palm
hat, was broad and smooth; while the strength of his noble, but
stern brows was relieved by clustering locks of light brown hair that
escaped from his hat, and rested upon his temples. A light, elegant
mustache graced his upper lip, and a peaked, well trimmed beard
descended
to his breast. He wore a straight sword at his side, and in
his belt was stuck a pistol, and a long two-edged hunting-knife. His
smile was pleasant, and the few low words he from time to time
returned
for the courteous flow of gossip with which Katrine
entertained
him, seemed, from her frequent laughs, not only to give her great
pleasure, but to be sufficiently well-timednotwithstanding he was
all the while more intent in listening to the conversation of those
about the fire-place, than to her.
`Come, Colonel,' she said at length, seeing that he thought less of
her words than he seemed to; `leave the tap-room, and go back into
the little parlor, where thy supper is laid. There is wine and warm
welcome for thee there.'
`Such welcome were a thing not lightly to be turned from, Katrine,'
he said, but I pray thee let me listen a-while to these cavaliers. Their
discourse hath especial interest for me.'
`It is nothing but dry assembly talk; I hear it from morning 'till
night, until I wish there was no such thing as politics in the world.'
`Were there no politics, dame, thou would'st scarce have so
crowded a hotel as thou hast this night,' answered the cavalier.
`That is true; but we need not listen to them.'
`Go, Katrine, I will presently follow thee, and do justice to thy
board.'
Thus speaking, he quitted the easy, lounging posture he had
hitherto
assumed, as he leaned with his ear towards the hostess, and moved,
as if with careless purpose, towards the fire-place, yet not so near as
to attract observation by the act.
`These painted pagans that so infest our borders with fire and
death in their train,
must
be exterminated,' said one of the older
gentlemen
of the group, continuing the conversation, and striking his
gold-headed staff upon the hearth, to enforce, by its emphasis, his
energetic words.
`They have, a second time, come within thirty miles of Jamestown,
and the light of their war-fires has illuminated the horizon of our
very capital,' said another. `Why Sir William does not send out
troops to protect the frontier, and punish these savages, is better
known to himself than it is to me.'
`Sir William Berkley, our excellent governor, hath too much
wisdom
to shoot bullets through beaver-skins,' sqeaked a low, chuckling
voice, in a distant part of the room.
Every one looked in the direction from which it proceeded, and
discovered
in the speaker the squat
trader
, who was bargaining with the
friendly Indians.
`What mean you, sirrah?' demanded one of the members, with
indignation
.
`We all know that Sir William loves the ring of gold and silver as
well as a Jew,' said the little man with a boldness singularly
contrasting
with his small voice and diminutive appearance, `and while he
can buy beaver-skins for a blue bead each, and sell them to his
factors
at a dollar, he will not, by going to war with our red friends, put
an end to profitable gains.'
`By Saint George! there spoke a true word if the devil had given
it speech! cried the second speaker with animation.
`And herein,' said the first, `lieth, I do verily believe, the secret of
the whole matter. The trader hath got the thumb end.'
`Shall we suffer this thing to be, gentlemen,' said a bold, slashing
cavalier, with a red face, and altogether a dissipated air, who made
one of the group; `shall our lives be put in the balance against the
governor's cupidity. It is but three hours since the rumor came
flying
in, that seventeen men have been slain within fifty miles of us,
since Saturday night. Sir William must learn that freemen's lives
are not to be measured with beaver-tails.'
`Tut, tut, Larence, man!' said one of the party, laughing; `you
speak treason that will bring you to a hempen neck-cloth'
`
If it be treason
, then have I also a hand in it,' said the young
cavalier, who had been listening to their conversation with deep
attention
.
He strode towards the fire-place as he spoke, and the
exclamation
,
`Colonel Bacon!' from every one present, showed that he
was no stranger to them, though their manner evinced surprise, both
at his presence and language. `Yes, gentlemen,' he continued,
after
exchanging brief and courteous salulations with them, `if Major
Larence had spoken treason, then is every true and honest man in
this dominion a traitor! Sir William Berkley looks more to his own
interest than to the colony's, and hath some deeper purpose in his
forhearance towards the savages who have been so long suffered to
lay waste our borders, than appears,unless this trader hath hit upon
the truth.'
`This is bold language, Colonel Bacon,' said one of the gentlemen,
`to deliver in the hearing of a member of Sir William Berkley's
council.'
`Sir William Berkley himself, shall hear a plainer speech than
even this, Mr. Oglethrope. I have come to Jamestown to-night to
ask his Excellency a commission, that I may levy men and go against
these Indian robbers.'
`This is a bold procedure, sir,' said the old counsellor, with
surprise
.
`The times require bold steps,' was the reply of the young man.
`If the Governor refuse to commission you?' asked one of the
gentlemen, all of whom had now risen from their seats and were
gathered around the young Virginia cavalier, actuated by various
feelings
,
as hostility or friendship to Sir William Berkley influenced their
views of this proposed step.
`I will in that case, on my own responsibility, raise a party of men
who have got too much of the Briton in them to be slaves to any
man's will, and go forth against them myself.'
`What greater cause have you than other men to take up arms,
that you must do this even if you have to do it as a rebel?' asked the
counsellor.
`Love for my ill governed country, lest it be ruined by the
misconduct
of those in power. Besides,' he added, in a low, deep tone of
vengeance, `did not all you know my cousin and more than brother,
Enery Warwick?'
`The noblest spirit in the province,' was the unanimous reply.
`Well, sir, he died yesterday,' continued Bacon, calmly.
`Dead?how came it?'
`By the murderous tomahawk of the savage chief Cineca!' was
the low, deep, and almost terrific reply.
`This must be looked to,' said the counsellor after a moment's
silent
surprise.
`
It shall be looked to
, or Sir William Berkley's head shall answer
it,' responded Bacon sternly; and strode from the apartment, leaving
ing them full of wonder and apprehension of they knew not what
impending
evil.
CHAPTER II.
Scene in the Library.
Sir William Berkley was seated in his library, the closely drawn
window curtains of which could not shut out the vivid lightning of
the storm that raged without, while occasional peals of thunder shook
his dwelling to its foundation. `Greene Spring,' the seat of Sir
William, was a handsome villa, constructed after the old fashioned
Virginia style, with a broad hall running through the centre, spacious
wings, and a light colonade or gallery, quite encompassing it. A
wide lawn, dotted with oaks separated it from James River, near which
about a third of a mile from the town it stood.Here Sir William
Berkley lived, in the style of a wealthy country gentleman, as well
as Governor, though his hospitality was limited by a certain care for
money, characteristic of him, that better became a King's factor, than a
King's Governor, or his own high birth. He was a lover of mammon,
and made his office rather the instrument for the acquisition of wealth,
than for the weal and prosperity of the colony. Aside from this
failing
,
he was a well-bred gentleman, courteous, polite and affablefor
these are qualities that cost nothing, and most avaricious men are
lavish enough of them so long as their purse strings are not invaded.
One great source of his wealth was trading with the Indians, which
his station enabled him to do to advantage, and to make a monopoly
of the traffic. For two years past, the Indians had been exceedingly
troublesome, and were constantly perpetrating atrocious murders
along the frontier, on the plea, sufficiently well grounded, that the
government was indebted to them for former services in war, in which
several of their warriors had been sacrificed, and for which their
widows had received no remuneration. Numerous petitions had been
made to Sir William Berkley from the planters along the borders,
either to satisfy the claim or send troops to protect them. Their
applications
were disregarded, and the savages became bolder, and at
length so dangerous and formidable, that all the inhabitants of the
region, open to their inroads, fled from their homes to the towns,
leading them with their cattle and harvests, a prey to their enemies.
This was the crisis of affairs at the present time. But Governor
Berkley was too wise, (to quote the language of the trader,) `to shoot
a bullet through a beaver skin,'and so long as the Indians would
send in their furs, he was indifferent how many of his colony were
carried off and massacred.
There were two persons in the library with Sir William. One of
them was a rough, weather-beaten sea captain; who stood twirling his
tarpaulin near the table where the Governor sat in ruff, velvet, and
powdered wig. The other, who stood opposite the sailor, was an
Indian
chief of the highest rank, judging from the war-eagle's feather,
that graced the coronet of scarlet plumes he wore.
`How many skins, Cineca, have you brought down in your canoes,
said you?' asked the Governor, who was in the attitude of writing,
with a gold pencil in his fingers.
`Five canoesthousand skins in each canoe,' answered the Indian,
in good English.
`And what am I to give you for them?'
`One keg powder, one keg whiskey, twelve guns and one hundred
pounds lead, with pipes and tobacco for five warriors.'
`This will never do, Chief! 'tis too much, too much, Cineca!'
`Brother get the skins very cheap,' answered the Indian.
`Too muchtoo much,' repeated Sir William, `I will give you but
ten guns, and fifty pounds of lead, with pipes and tobacco for thyself.'
`Cineca must have what he said,' replied the Indian firmly.
`You are growing too sharp, Cineca. Two years ago I bought
twice as many of you at a fifth of the price.'
`Cineca was a child thenhe is now a manbrother will pay.'
`Well, be it sobut see that you use not these guns against my
people,' said Sir William with a smile. `I hear sad accounts from
your warriors. Set them to catching beavers, and they will have but
little time to molest our borderers. I shall have to send troops
against you, and then there will be an end of your thriving beaver
trade.'
`Warriors love better to hunt men than beaver. If we fight, we no
hunt: a scalp is worth a hundred beaver skins,' answered the savage
Chief with a kindling eye.
`Go to, Chief! Let me hear no more of these murders on the
frontier! To-morrow, deliver your skins to my factor and you shall
receive your pay. Now Captain,' he said turning to the sailor after
the Indian left the apartment, `I must have these skins packed and
aboard by Thursday night, which will complete the tale of your rich
freight, and you can sail on Friday morning.'
`On
Friday
, Sir William?'
`Surely why do you show such consternation?'
`It is an unlucky day, William. I would not put to sea on Friday,
if I expected to have luck on the passage.'
`You are a fool. Then drive work, and sail Thursday night; they
shall not lay a day for man's superstition. The market by last
accounts
was high, and I would dispatch. If the voyage end
prosperously
,
'twill make me eight thousand pounds richer than at its
beginning
.Well,
Edward, what now?' he demanded of a servant who
entered.
`A gentleman desires to see your Excellency.'
`His name? He must have business pressing to venture abroad in
in this storm.'
`He gave nonebut that he was a Virginian.'
`This smacks! These haughty Virginians, I verily believe, do
look upon themselves as better men than born Britons. Bid him
come in. More complaints of the Indians, I'll warrant me. You
may go, Captain, and see that the rising sun of Friday shines on your
canvas ten leagues a-sea!'
The Captain took his leave as the servant ushered in the new
visitant
.
`Ha, Colonel Bacon! you are welcome!Come upon the old
subject, I doubt not,' said the Governor petulantly.
`If your Excellency by this phraseology means the subject of our
border grievances, permit me to say it is a
new
subject. Would to
God we could say it was an old one! But each day's deeds seem to
keep it fresh, and I have hither come from my plantation to see if by
your aid this grievance may not be abated, and so made old to those
who would hereafter speak of it.'
`There is no cause for this array of petitions with which I am
hourly beseiged. What bloody deeds the Indians have committed,
they have been provoked to by men who would push their possessions
into their hunting grounds.'
`I am not here, your Excellency, to discuss a question which you
have handled in all its bearings. I am here to pray you to give us
present aid, that our homes may not be made desolate.'
`I have but few household troops, and our militia have little
relish
for fighting with savages. I question if I could raise five
hundred
men in all the counties to carry on war with these barbarians.'
`I do not ask you to raise a single man, Sir William. If you will
commission me to raise what men I may, and leave me to carry on
this barbaric war, you shall hear no more of petitions,' said Bacon,
with animation.
`Commission
you
, Nathaniel Bacon?' repeated the Governer
starting
with surprise.
`I said so, your Excellency,' said Bacon quietly.
`Never, by Heaven! You would soon be general-in-chief, and
face God! I should have to look out for my own safety and authority.
No, no! I had enough of your fiery ambitions spirit when you were
ast year, a member of the Assembly. You were then like to have
o'ertopped all other gentlemen! By the round head of Noll Cromwell
but this is a singular proposition for you to make to me, sir.'
`Will you commission me, Sir William?' asked Bacon, when he
had ended, unmoved by his violent language.
`Commission you! if you want a commission, go to the devil for
it!'
The young Virginian struck his sword hilt, as if he would have
unsheathed
it at this insulting retort, but recollecting himself, said
calmly
:
`Nay, I will not draw my sword save for my country, you have both
refused to give me men and to commission me. Now mark, sir!
Commission
or no commission I do from this hour give myself to this
service.'
Thus speaking, he left the library, and the house of the Governor
and returned to the inn, where ordering his horse, he galloped off,
dark and stormy as it was, and departed from the town.
CHAPTER III.
Scene in the Assembly.
Not a week elapsed after the interview between these two
gentlemen
,
ere the rumor reached Jamestown that Colonel Bacon had put
himself at the head of one hundred mounted men, mostly of estate,
and marched against the Indians, over whom he had gained a most
signal
victory, The Assembly was in session at the time, with the
Governor
presiding, and the report was received by this body with
incredulity
.
But a few hours afterwards it was confirmed by a special
messenger to the Governor, who was none other than the Cineca
himself
,
who with his life had barely escaped from the slaughter of his
warriors. The matter was instantly laid before the Assembly, which
was composed nearly equally of those who approved this course of
Bacon, and those who sided with the Governer in condemning it. The
latter faction, instead of appeasing Sir William's anger, devised means
to increase it, by framing specious pretences, which they grounded on
the audacity of Bacon's conduct, and the hold he had already got
upon
the popular affection. Indeed, many of these gentlemen on their
own part, began to have Bacon's suddenly displayed merits in distrust,
and to look upon him as a rival that would endanger their own
personal
consideration.
Though he was a very young man, they saw plainly that he was
master of those talents which win popular favor and confidence, to
which he united great wisdom and discretion. `By which
embellshments
,'
says a contemporary, `they thought if hee should bee suffered
to continue at the head of a growing army, they, instead of being
seniors, might become juniors, while their younger brother, (Col.
Bacon
,)
through the nimbleness of his witt, might steale away that
blessing
which they accounted their own birthright; and also Sir William
thought this rash proceeding of Bacon, if it it did not undoe himselfe
by his failing in the enterprize, might chance to undoe him in the
affections of the people; which to prevent, he thought it conducible
to his intress and establishment, to proclaim him a
rebell
.
Accordingly, before the Assembly adjourned for that day,
Nathaniel
Bacon was proclaimed a rebel, and forces were raised to reduce
him to his duty. Scarcely had the proclamation been published, ere
intelligence reached Jamestown that Bacon's force had increased to
seven hundred men, that his army had constituted him General, that
a second victory over the Indians had brought them to terms of peace
for the time, and thus ended the war. This news was received with
demonstrations of joy by the people generally, but filled the Governer
and the enemies of Bacon with jealous alarm. Sir William Berkley
believed, or affected to believe, that his next step would be to march
against himself, and he immediately called upon his `Train Band,'
and all true men of the province, to arm in defence of their country
against so dangerous an insurgent. Such intentions, however,
as the Governor saw fit to attribute to the young leader, had never
entered Colonel Bacon's mind. His only object in taking up arms
was to free his country from a ruthless foe, which growing confident
in the supineness and inaction of the government, threatened to
inundate
the whole land with blood.
`He was a man of quality and merit, brave and eloquent, and
became
much endeared to the people, not so much for what he had done,
as for what they expected he would doe to deserve their devotion,' says
an old writer of that day; `while with no common zeale they sent
up their reiterated prayers, first to himselfe, and next to Heaven, that
he may become their guardian angele to protect them against the
Indians
,
now that the governer cared not whether they were slain or
noe.' Thus in a few days had this young man ingratiated himself
into the affections of the people, and become indeed, should he see fit
to use his power, a formidable rival to the jealous Governor.
Bacon having dispersed the Indians, returned to his own country
and dismissed his forces, with orders to be ready to obey his call at
any moment. He here learned with scornful indignation that the
Governor had proclaimed him both a rebel and traitor. The country
had recently chosen a burgess for the Assembly, who, from some
accidental
circumstance, was detained from joining his colleagues up
to the time of General Bacon's return; and it was necessary that a
substitute should he appointed, and the young insurgent chief was
unanimously chosen to fill the station. He gladly accepted the
nomination
,
for he wished once more, now that he had done good service
against the common enemy, to see Sir William Berkley, and be
commissioned
by him, as well as to have the proclamation that had
outlawed
him, revoked. He therefore, immediately on being elected
burgess, embarked in a sloop with thirty of his friends and adherents,
and sailed down James river, (on the banks of which, near the head
waters, his plantation was situated,) towards the provincial capital.
It was night when he arrived and anchored off the town. The
Assembly
were yet sitting, by the light of their lamps which shone through
the windows of the State house, pencilling long lines of light upon
the limpid stream. Trusting to the privileges of his official character
as an elected burgess, and without reflecting that as an outlaw his
election was illegal, the young chief determined to go on shore at
once and take his seat in the Assembly. He jumped into a boat, and
attended only by Major Larence and another friend, pulled to the land.
The night was clear and starry, and the town they were approaching,
seemed to sleep, all was so still. Lights burning here and there in a
chamber window, and the occasional howl of a dog from the dark mass
of houses, alone gave signs that they were near the congregrated
abodes of men. As they touched the shore where a few water oaks
bent over the stream, they heard the distant sound of the drum and
fife, and then followed the varied roll of the
tatoo
, rising and falling
on the wind, telling that them the town was garrisoned and alert.
`Berkley has taken care of himself,' said Major Larence, after
listening
an instant to the martial sounds. `You had best follow his
example.'
`I fear nothing for myself. Return to the sloop, and let me go
alone to the council chamber. Nay, it is best that I should do so. If
I bring friends along with me, it will look like suspicion.'
After a few words of expostulation on the part of Major Larance,
he consented to remain where he was by the boat, that he might be
ready to succor his friend if his frank confidence should bring him
into peril.
When Col. Bacon reached the state house, he was surprised to see
a guard of soldiers drawn up around it. Without hesitation he
advanced
to the entrance of the hall, and demanded admittance into the
Assembly.
`It were as much as my commission is worth, sir, to admit you,'
said the captain, recognizing him in evident alarm, `are you alone?'
`Alone!'
`Then passbut I would rather, for your own safety, sir, you should
retire,' he said in a low tone.
`What have I to fear, captain?'
`The Governor's jealousy, and the rival enmity of your colleagues!'
`I will meet it. Let me pass in!'
The guard stood aside, and the bold young leader opened the door,
and strode into the hall of the Assembly. Without stopping, he
walked
quite up to the forum, just in front of which was the chair for the
burgess of his county, and without a word, and in the face of the
whole body, quietly took his seat. The surprise his appearance and
conduct excited, having a little subsided, the Governer was the first to
speak.
`How is this, sir traitor! we are bearded in our very Assembly!
What doest thou here, arch rebel?'
`Represent my constituents,' answered Bacon firmly, and with a
smile of proud contempt on his fine dark face. He then rose and laid
4
upon the table his credentials, which the Governor examined with the
closest
scrutiny.
`These are in form, sir, but they do not apply to a traitor. No banned
man is eligible to any office of dignity or trust. Gentlemen, this outlaw,
Nathaniel Bacon, hath had the audacity to permit himself to be chosen
burgess of his county, after proclamation of treason against him, and now
demands his seat with as honest a front, as if he were a true man. Will
you receive him among your number?'
`Ay, ayno, no!' for several moments filled the hall from conflicting
voices, when the Governor, to put an end to it, cried out
`Ho, sergeant! command Captain Wilfred to march in a file of men and
take his prisoner.'
`Ha, this treachery!' exclaimed Bacon, halt drawing his sword,
`Treachery!' repeated Sir William, with a smile of triumph, `Seize the
traitor!' he cried, the soldiers entered, and marched up the hall to the spot
where he stood.
`I will not resist your Excellency,' said Bacon, giving up his sword to
the captain of the guard, `lest it should look like guilt. I yield myself
your prisoner, and leave the adjudgment of my case to my country.'
The Assembly broke up in confusion, and Bacon was led to the prison,
where, before midnight, the Governor sent his thirty friends to join him,
putting them in irons, having by stratagem captured the sloop as it lay off
the town, on learning that it was the vessel that had brought Bacon down
the river.
CHAPTER VI.
The Trial for Treason.
The
next day Bacon and his adherents were brought ironed into the
presence of the Governor and council, who constituted a tribunal for the
trial of the offence with which he was charged. The state house was filled
with people, and the excitement was so great throughout the town, not only
among the citizens, but the members of the assembly and strangers, that
the governor was forced to place a strong guard in and about the council
chamber. His soldiers, however, had caught the enthusiasm which the
young insurgent's brilliant actions had created in the minds of all, and were
as likely to go over to Bacon's party, as adhere to the Governor. Sir
William
Berkley was penetrating enough to see this; and policy dictated to
him a mild course, lest by severity he should rouse the indignation of the
people and thwart his own ends.
After the usual preliminaries in cases of trial for treason were gone
through, Colonel Bacon abruptly rose and thus spoke in his defence:
`I stand here, gentlemen, manacled like a condemned felon, charged
with high treason! I ask whether as a man wholly devoted to his king and
country, who has adventured his life and his honor too, to punish enemies
in arms against his king and country, be a traitor? I ask if a man who
never plotted, contrived, or endeavored the destruction, detriment, or wrong
of any of His Majesty's subjects, their lives, fortunes or estates, deserves
the name of
rebel
and traitor? If this be treachery, then am I a traitor!
If this be rebellion, then am I rebel! But 'till patriotism be proven to be
treason, devotion to the king, disloyalty, and love of country rebellion, I
stand before God an honest man and a faithful subject! Behold my
conduct
in the affair for which I am here in chains. Behold that of my brave
soldiers! I call upon the whole country to witness against me or them, if
they can! There are some men in authority, who, from weakness of
intellect
,
cannot distinguish between patriotism and rebellion; or, who have
such vicious natures themselves, that they can see no good in others!
`I have not sought wealth by trickery! I have not sought honor by
sycophancy! I have not been blinded by the glitter of gold! I have not
been a sponge to suck up the public treasure! The colony has become a
mart, and rulers, forgetting their station, have become pedlars and brokers!
What arts have been promoted in the colony? what sciences, what schools
of learning or manufactories have been established and nourished in
authority
!
Barter and trade, pounds and pennies are the God here
worshipped
.
Such being the universal degeneracy it becomes those men who had
remained
honest, to look after the country's good. I justify my campaign against the
Indians. It is true I have incurred the displeasure of Sir William Berkley,
by declaring war against his friends, and, doubtless, beaver-skins will be
less abundant in town, for a time. It is well known to all who hear me,
that I have done Sir William great wrong, and am viewed in his eyes
rather
as a robber who hath taken from his purse, than as a traitor, false to his
allegiance. But a traitor is easily saidwhile to prove a man a robber for
slaying a few scores of savages, who have long infested the frontier, were
a more difficult thing. We all know his Excellency's friendship for his
tanny friends, and that to our disgrace and shame, he hath, in this very
court, refused to admit a Virginian's oath against an Indian, when that
Indian's
bare word was accepted against a Virginian. I do but mention these
things, my friends, to refresh your memories. I would also hint to Sir
William, who listens with commendable patience, that it is not in his
power
to dispose of his favorite beaver trade to his own profit, it being a
monopoly
of the crown. But this he must settle with his Majesty. The
powder
,
shot, and fire-arms he hath given to the Indians, contrary to the laws of
the colony, hath made him a buyer and seller of the blood of his own
brethren and countrymenthis he must settle with his own conscience.
But, gentlemen, I have done! I have but reviewed the Governor's course
in contrast with my own. You will see who best deserves to be call'
`What?' demanded the Governor, fiercely.
`
Traitor!
' continued Bacon, in a firm tone.
`Seize and drag him to execution.'
`Sir Governor, you have no power to do this thing,' said Bacon,
fearlessly
;
`I appeal to the King and parliament, where justice and wisdom yet
dwell, and where mine and the people's cause will be impartially heard
and wisely adjudged.'
This speech of the insurgent leader had an electric effect upon the
audience
of people, and he had no sooner ended, than shouts of applause,
mingled
with epithets of opprobrium against the Governor, filled the hall, and
were re-echoed from the green without. Sir William Berkley was the
while burning with indignant mortification, for the words and ironical
manner
of his prisoner, had cut him sorely. He would at once have him led
forth and shot, but that he feared the multitude, whose temper was not to
profit, it being a monopoly of the crown. But this he must settle
with his Majesty. The powder, shot, and fire arms he hath given to
the Indians, contrary to the laws of the colony, hath made him a bnyer
and seller of the blood of his own brethren and countrymenthis he
must settle with his own conscience. But, gentlemen, I have done!
I have but reviewed the governor's course in contrast with my own.
You will see who best deserves to be called'
`What?' demanded the Governor, fiercely.
`
Traitor!
' continued Bacon in a firm tone.
`Seize and drag him to execution.'
`Sir Governor, you have no powerr to do this thing,' said Bacon,
fearlessly; `I appeal to the King and parliament, where justice and
wisdom yet dwell, and where mine and the people's cause will be
impartially
heard and wisely adjudged.'
This speech of the insurgent leader had an electric effect upon the
anduence of people, and he had no sooner ended than shouts of
applause
,
mingled with epithets of opprobrium against the Governor,
filled the hall, and were re-echoed from the green without. Sir
William
Berkley was the while burning with indignant mortification, for
the words and ironical manner of his prisoner, had cut him sorely.
He would at once have had him led forth and shot, but that he feared
the multitude, whose temper was not to be trifled with. He also
feared
the result of the appeal to the King, and trembled to have the
gangrene
of his own character lain open to the assembled parliament by
so sharp a knife as the tongue of the young insurgent leader. After
consulting a few moments with his counsel on the bench, he turned
ty the prisoner, and said in a tone of assumed blandness
`Nathaniel Bacon, I do graciously forgive your harsh language of
myself, and by the advice of my counsel, offer you pardon for your
offences, on condition of your waiting patiently until I can raise
forces
for your command. I also acquit from, and pardon all
misdemeanors
of your friends now at the bar, restoring you, furthermore,
and confirming to you your seat in the assembly.'
Bacon fixed his penetrating glance upon the Governor while he was
speaking, and smiled as if he understood the motive that influenced
his conduct, which he was satisfied was fear of losing his popularity
with the colonists, and so of being recalled from his polite
governorship
.
`I promise,' answered Bacon, `if the commission
you
promise be
given to me in fourteen days. Your red friends on the borders, Sir
William, are by no means wholly quieted, and the men you propose
to raise may soon be wanted in the field.'
`You shall have the commission, Colonel Bacon, and I trust,
hence-forward
,
all differences between us will end.'
Thus spoke the wily Governor, who, by commissioning Bacon under
himself, in the regular colonial forces of his own levying, hoped to
destroy that extraordinary popularity, which, as an independent
leader
of a chivalrous volunteer army, he was so rapidly acquiring. By
this master-stroke he felt confident he should effectually destroy the
rival power that threatened his own ruin. It was done at a great
sacrifice of every personal feelingfor the deepest enmity rankled in his
breast against him. He then rose, and taking Colonel Bacon by the
hand, (after first ordering his manacles to be unlocked,) and placed him in
his seat among the members of the assembly. The multitude, blinded by
this unexpected termination of the scene, sent up a shout as loud as that
which had before burst from them. Sir William Berkley, courteously
smiling and this testimony of their approbation, then dismissed the court,
and putting his arm in that of Colonel Bacon, left the hall followed by his
council and the members of the assembly.
CHAPTER V.
OCCUPATION OF THE TOWN BY INSURGENTS.
The news of the arrest of Bacon and his adherents had flown like
wildfire
from Jamestown to the interior, and before night, a hundred of his
friends, mounted and armed, were in the town, who finding him restored
to favor, and his adherents to liberty, returned home satisfied, and with
better
feelings towards the Governer. Sir William Berkley took advantage of
this favorable state of the public mind, and seeing all was once more quiet,
issued private warrants to take him again, he having gone to his plantation.
At the same time he sent to levy the militia of one of the connties which,
situated on the opposite side of the bay, had not inoculated with Bacon's
`treason,' and would, doubtless, readily obey his orders, so that, holding the
balance of power in his own hands, he might withstand any attempts of
Bacon's adherents to rescue him, (should he arrest him,) or avert the course
of his vengeance.
Bacon, however, was far from being a dupe, to the Governer's duplicity.
He anticipated these very steps, and had no sooner reached his own country
than he dispatched secret orders to his captains and other officers, to be in
readiness for action. At the end of the fourteenth day, he sent a
messenger
to Jamestown for his commission. Sir William Berkley replied it
was ready for him, and the troops already levied, and would be in
Jamestown
the third day thereafter, to the number of one thousand men.
`There shall be a thousand men there before them, you little suspect, Sir
William,' said Bacon with a smile, when the messenger returned him this
answer, for he had heard of the private warrant, and now determined to
act.
The same evening he was riding towards Jamestown with nine hundred
mounted men at his back. The Governor had rumor of his approach, and
in great alarm sent to the well-disposed districts, on both sides of the James
river, for forces to defend the town, upon which he was now assured Bacon
determined to make an attack.
Expresses came hourly of the army's approach, and at two o'clock the
ensuing day, the insurgents, (now for the first time, really such,) entered the
town without being withstood, and formed a body upon the green. `Not
a fflight shot ffrom the end of State House, of horse and ffoot, as regular
drawn up in battel array as veteran troopers, and possessing themselves
forthwith of all avenues, disarming all the towne, and coming thither both
in boats, and by the land.'
In half an hour after this, the drum beat for the Assembly to meet, and
soon after, the rebel chief came with a file of fusileers, to the outer porch of
the council chamber, when the Governor and council went forth to meet
him. The scene that followed, is best described in the words of an
eye-witness, who was a member of the assembly, and a partizan to the
Governor
.
`We saw from the windowe, the Governor open his breast when he saw
Bacon advancing upon him with such hostile bearings. The rebell captain
walked between his two files of soldiers, with a fierce aspect and haughtier
front, and seemingly in great ire and displeasure at the Governor. We did
momently fear he would bid his men fall upon Sir William, and those with
him, and we of the assembly expected the same immediate fate. I step'd
down to the out-door, and among the crowd, found the seamen of my
plantation
sloop, who, in great fear, prayed me not to stir from them. I then
saw the Governor, who was looking very pale, for he had not two hundred
soldiers in the town to stick by him, walk towards his private apartment;
a coits' cast distant from the other end of the state house, the gentlemen of
the council following him. After him walked Colonel Bacon, commanding
his soldiers cock their pieces if any would escape, striking his hand on his
sword menacingly. The fusileers with their fusils cocked, presented them
at a window of the assembly chamber, filled with faces of the members,
and repeated in savage voices. `We will have it! we will have it!'
`What will you have?' asked one from the window.
`The commission!' answered they.
`You shall have it! you shall have it!' repeated the gentlemen, three or
four times, shaking his white handherchief out of the windowe.
At these words they unbent the locks of their fusils, and stood still until
Bacon coming back, (for he had entered the private room with the
Governor
,)
the followed to the main body.
`In this hubbub, a servant of mine got so nigh as to hear the Governor's
words, when he opened his breast, and also what Mr. Bacon said. Said
the Gov'nor
`Here! shoot me! 'fore God, fair mark! shoot!' After rehearsing the
same without any other words, whereto Mr. Bacon replied:
`Nomay it please yo'r excellencewe will not hurt a hair of yo'r head,
nor any other gentlemen present. We come for a commission to save our
lives and estates from the Indians. This you promised, and have deceived
me, and, moreover, have tried to have me arrested, meanwhile, that you
might get me into your hands. We want you to fulfil your promise, and
we do assure you we will have the commission before we goe,'
`And afterwards I heard it was said, Bacon ordered his fusileers, when
they were aiming at the windows full of faces, that if he should draw his
sword, they were on sight, of it, to fire and slay us, gazing out of the
window
,
saying, `I'll put to death, Gov'nor, council, assemblie and all, but that
I'll have the commission!' So near was the massacre of us all that very
minit, he had drawn his sword before the pacific handkercher was shaken
out of the windowe!'
The insurgent leader, on quitting the private apartment of the Governor,
where he had left him with his council, entered the assembly alone, leaving
his guard at the entrance, and haughtily demanded a commission to be
then and there given him. The speaker remained silent, when one of
Bacon's
friends rose up and said with courtesy:
`We would most willingly do this, Colonel Bacon, but you must be aware
that to grant it, is not in our province or power, nor in any other, save the
King's vicegerent, our Governor.'
At length the Govornor and council came in, and promised that if he
would withdraw his troops, he should, the next day, receive a commission
as general of the forces which he now illegally commanded. To this, after
some discussion, he consented, desiring, if possible to avert bloodshed, by
bringing his troops in collosion with Governers Gloster's militia, which
would arrive the next dayhis object being to obtain peaceibly, if he could,
forcibly if he must, legal authority to raise men in defence of the frontier.
Through all his conduct, he had shown a degree of moderation that proved
that he was actuated only by love for his country, and that, so far, he had
little deserved the stigma which was attached to his name.
CHAPTER VI.
CONCLUSION.
The next day Bacon, he, having withdrawn his army a league from the
town, despatched a messenger to receive the commission of general that
had been promised to him. During the absence of this individual, rumor
came that the Indians, taking advantage of the intestine civil broils
between
the Governor's and Bacon's factions, had penetrated within forty
miles of the capital, with a large force, burning and slaying wherever they
came. He immediately placed his men in order of march, and on
horseback
,
surrounded by his chief officers, waited the return of his messenger.
He at length appeared, and said that he was commanded by the Governor
to say that the commission could be given only to Colonel Bacon in person,
and that if he delayed longer than the third day thereafter, to come and
receive
it, it would be clearly taken for granted that he did not truly desire it,
and only had demanded it to cover his own rebellious designs.
This reply fired Bacon with indignation; but he knew too well the
character
of the Governor to be surprised at it. His first impulse was to march
into the town, and chastise the Governor who had sent such a message,
and the assembly that had ratified it. But his love for his country
over-came
his personal feelings, and without hesitation, he gave the command
to march forthwith against the Indians.
He had been on his march but a few hours, when the Governor's troops,
to the number of twelve hundred men, arrived in the town, and encamped
on the green so lately occupied by the insurgent forces. He immediately
ordered them to be in readiness to pursue Bacon, whom he now a second
time proclaimed a rebel, and on pain of forfeiture of estate and
imprisonment
,
aid him in suppressing the rebellion.
At this time arose a murmur of dissatisfaction among the troops, already
favoring Bacon's proceedings; and answering that they came `to fight
Indians
,
and not Virginians,' they re-embarked in three boats and vessels, and
to a man returned across the bay their homes.
council of war, fairly tried him, and proved that he had thrice gone
between
his enemy and Jamestown, on private service for the Governor. The
proof was clear; yet Bacon, unwilling to shed the first blood in the quarrel,
declared openly to him, in the hearing of the whole line, `that if one man
in the army would speak a word to save him, he should not suffer death.'
No one interceded for him, and he was shot. This clemency of the
insurgent
leader greatly increased his popularity, and added numbers, hitherto
neutral, to the force he commanded.
Sir William Berkley, on hearing of Bacon's approach, tried to gather a
force to withstand him.
But the popularity of the opposite cause was greater than that of the
loyal party, and he could not muster more than three hundred men to
stand by him in the defencea third of whom were members of the
Assembly
,
and private gentlemen personally disaffected towards Bacon.
With these, however, the Governor determined to make resistance, and
threw up a breast-work across the narrow peninsula, which joined the
town to the main land. This he protected by four pieces of cannon
planted
a hundred rods in the rear; and taking up his position with more
resolution
and courage than it was supposed his bartering and avaricious spirit
had left in him, he waited the advance of the insurgents.
The same afternoon, Bacon arrived in sight of the works, and taking a
close view of them, did not see fit to attack the position, but went to work
and threw up an embankment beyond musket shot and twice the height of
the barrier, so that in the morning the Governor found that his position
was commanded by that of his enemy. He elevated his cannon, and was
about to open a fire upon his work, when to his surprise, he saw several
ladies appear upon the rebel's ramparts, whose husbands were with him
in his own party. This produced surprise and consternation on his side,
and the firing was instantly withheld. As they stood uncertain how to act,
they found their own defences suddenly and in d moment carried, while
they, for fear of slaying the ladies on the ramparts, were unable to return a
single shot. This singular step on the part of the insurgent leader was
taken doubtless to prevent unnecessary blood-shed, in which he was
partially
successful. The Governor finding his works carried and the enemy
in the town, resisted them a few minutes, and then, with the loss of several
men, precipitately fled to his vessels, and crossing the bay left the town in
the hands of the rebels.
The quarrel had now taken the aspect of a civil war, and Bacon felt that
he had gone too far to retract. He now resolved to take the government
into his own hands, send out a true representation of the whole affair to
His Majesty, and throw himself upon the king's clemency. He was
herein
a rebel, but not a traitor. To any other man than Sir William Berkley,
appointed by the king, he was ready to resign his authority and yield up
his power. To him he determined never again to pay allegiance.
Up to this period, the impartial historian will perhaps justify the
conduct
of Nathaneil Bacon. He was now, however, under the excitement of
conquests, about to commit an act, but for which his name might have
come down to us as that of a patriot leader of the loftiest virtue and
courage
.
It is difficult to tell why Colonel Bacon should have burned
Jamestown
.
That he thought its destruction necessary to his safety, is probable.
But whatever may have been his motive for this flagrant act, it stands
recorded
against him as a crime of the deepest dye, and is the main point on
which hangs his reputation as a lawless rebel. Before night, the whole
fair `towne' was in a heap of asheschurch and state house, hotel and
private
dwellingnot a roof remained to tell where in the morning stood the
capital!
The next day he marched out of the town, and prepared to take up a
strong position not far above on James River, having some unknown
design
in contemplation, when he was suddenly seized with illness while on
horseback, and died three days afterwardsit is said from the effects of
poison rubbed upon his saddle by the Indian Cineca.
This event at once put an end to the rebellion, which bid fair, measured
by the awakening ambition of its head, to separate Virginia from Great
Britain. Those gentlemen who could save themselves by flight instantly
did so. Many of the insurgent officers, among whom was Major Larence,
were taken and executed, and numerous estates were confiscated.
It was a season of triumph as well as profit to Sir William Berkley, who
soon made himself opulent on the rebel's spoils. He soon after went to
England, it was rumored by command of the king, leaving Colonel Jeffries
in his place as governor of the province. It is well known that Charles,
hearing of his arrival in London, said of him, with the characteristic
freedom
with which he was wont te speak of his public officers:
`That old fool has hanged more men in that naked country than I have
done for the murder of my father!'
The Governor, hearing of this, became so mortified with grief and
vexation
,
that he died soon after, without seeing His Majesty, his vast property
escheating to the crown.
Thus terminated the famous `Bacon's rebelion, and the lives of the
principal
actors therein.' If the private documents from which the facts in this
brief outline are taken, speak the truth, the name of Colonel Bacon will be
rescued from the infamy which has adhered to it, for a century and a half:
the stigma of corruption, cruelty and treachery, will be fixed on the
administration
by which he was condemned; and one more case will be added to
those which prove that insurrections proceed oftener from the misconduct of
those in power, than from the factious and turbulent temper of the people.
THE END
.`
Come
.
`
Mary
.'